Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1915.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY Section 2, Chapter 363, O.S.L.


2025 (6 O.S. Supp. 2025, Section 1520.1), is amended to read as


follows:


Section 1520.1. A. A digital asset kiosk operator shall not


engage in digital asset kiosk transactions or hold itself out as


being able to engage in digital asset kiosk transactions with or on


behalf of another person unless the digital asset kiosk operator is


licensed in this state as a money transmitter pursuant to the


Oklahoma Financial Transaction Reporting Act the Oklahoma Money


Transmission and Modernization Act.


1. Any digital asset kiosk operator acting in violation of this


subsection shall, upon conviction, be guilty of a misdemeanor,

Req. No. 3305 Page 3


punishable by a fine not less than Six Hundred Dollars ($600.00) nor


more than Two Thousand Dollars ($2,000.00) per violation, or by


imprisonment in the county jail for not less than thirty (30) days


nor more than one (1) year, or by both such fine and imprisonment.


2. Any digital asset kiosk which is used by a digital asset


kiosk operator in violation of this subsection may be seized at the


direction of the Attorney General by any commissioned peace officer


in this state. The procedures set forth in Section 1738 of Title 21


of the Oklahoma Statutes shall apply to any digital asset kiosk


seized under this subsection.


3. The Attorney General is authorized to promulgate rules to


effectuate the provisions of this subsection.


4. Any customer who has been fraudulently induced to engage in


digital asset transactions using a digital asset kiosk operated in


violation of this subsection may file a civil suit against the


digital asset kiosk operator for the amount of any losses sustained


by the customer related to such digital asset transactions.


B. A digital asset kiosk operator shall not locate or relocate,


or allow a third party to locate or relocate, a digital asset kiosk


in this state unless the digital asset kiosk operator has provided


notice of intent to locate or relocate a digital asset kiosk to the


Banking Department no less than ten (10) days prior to its


activation. The notice to the Banking Department shall contain the


same information for the digital asset kiosk to be located or

Req. No. 3305 Page 4


relocated as is required in the quarterly location report pursuant


to subsection C of this section.


C. Each digital asset kiosk operator shall submit a quarterly


report of the location of each digital asset kiosk located within


this state within forty-five (45) days of the end of the calendar


quarter. The location report shall include:


1. The company’s legal name;


2. Any fictitious or trade name;


3. The physical address;


4. The start date of operation of the digital asset kiosk at


each location; and


5. The end date of operation of the digital asset kiosk at each


location, if applicable.


D. A digital asset kiosk operator shall disclose in a clear,


conspicuous, and easily readable manner in the chosen language of


the customer all relevant terms and conditions generally associated


with the products, services, and activities of the digital asset


kiosk operator and digital assets.


1. The digital asset kiosk operator shall receive


acknowledgement of receipt of all disclosures required under this


act through confirmation of consent.


2. The disclosures under this act shall include:


a. a warning, written prominently and in bold type, and


provided separately from the disclosures below,

Req. No. 3305 Page 5


stating: “WARNING: LOSSES DUE TO FRAUDULENT OR


ACCIDENTAL TRANSACTIONS ARE NOT RECOVERABLE AND


TRANSACTIONS IN DIGITAL ASSETS ARE IRREVERSIBLE.


DIGITAL ASSET TRANSACTIONS MAY BE USED TO STEAL YOUR


MONEY BY CRIMINALS IMPERSONATING THE GOVERNMENT,


ORGANIZATIONS, OR YOUR LOVED ONES. THEY CAN THREATEN


JAIL TIME, SAY YOUR IDENTITY HAS BEEN STOLEN, ALLEGE


YOUR COMPUTER HAS BEEN HACKED, INSIST YOU WITHDRAW


MONEY FROM YOUR BANK ACCOUNT TO PURCHASE DIGITAL


ASSETS, OR A NUMBER OF OTHER SCAMS. IF YOU BELIEVE


YOU ARE BEING SCAMMED, CALL YOUR LOCAL LAW


ENFORCEMENT.”,


b. the material risks associated with digital assets and


digital asset transactions including, but not limited


to:


(1) a warning that once completed, the transaction


may not be reversed,


(2) the digital asset kiosk operator’s liability for


unauthorized digital asset transactions,


(3) the digital asset customer’s liability for


unauthorized currency transactions,


(4) that digital assets are not legal tender, backed


or insured by the government, and accounts and


value balances are not subject to Federal Deposit

Req. No. 3305 Page 6


Insurance Corporation, National Credit Union


Administration, or Securities Investor Protection


Corporation protections,


(5) that some digital asset transactions are deemed


to be made when recorded on a public ledger,


which may not be the date or time when the person


initiates the transaction,


(6) that a digital asset’s value may be derived from


market participants’ continued willingness to


exchange currency for digital assets, which may


result in the permanent and total loss of a


particular digital asset’s value if the market


for digital assets disappears,


(7) that a person who accepts a digital asset as


payment today is not required to accept and might


not accept a digital asset in the future,


(8) that the volatility and unpredictability of the


price of digital assets relative to currency may


result in a significant loss over a short period,


(9) that the nature of digital assets means that any


technological difficulties experienced by digital


asset kiosk operators may prevent access to or


use of a person’s digital assets, and



Req. No. 3305 Page 7


(10) that any bond maintained by the digital asset


kiosk operator for the benefit of a person may


not cover all losses a person incurs,


c. the amount of the transaction denominated in United


States dollars as well as the applicable digital


assets,


d. any fees or expenses charged by the digital asset


kiosk operator,


e. any applicable exchange rates,


f. a daily digital asset transaction limit of no more


than Two Thousand Dollars ($2,000.00) for new


customers,


g. notice of a change in the digital asset kiosk


operator’s rules or policies,


h. the name, address, and telephone number of the owner


of the digital asset kiosk and the days, times, and


means by which a customer can contact the owner for


customer assistance, displayed on or at the location


of the digital asset kiosk, or on the first screen of


the digital asset kiosk,


i. under what circumstances the digital asset kiosk


operator, without a court or government order,


discloses a person’s account information to third


parties, and

Req. No. 3305 Page 8


j. other disclosures that are customarily given in


connection with a digital asset transaction.


E. Upon each transaction’s completion, the digital asset kiosk


operator shall provide the customer with a receipt, in paper where


possible, in the language chosen by the customer containing the


following information:


1. The digital asset kiosk operator’s name and contact


information, including a telephone number to answer questions and


register complaints;


2. The type, value, date, and precise time of the transaction,


transaction hash, and each applicable digital asset address;


3. All fees charged;


4. The exchange rate of the digital asset to United States


dollars;


5. A statement of the digital asset kiosk operator’s liability


for nondelivery or delayed delivery; and


6. A statement of the digital asset kiosk operator’s refund


policy.


F. In the event that a paper receipt is not possible, the


digital asset kiosk operator shall post in a conspicuous manner


information by which a customer who has engaged in a digital asset


kiosk transaction can contact the digital asset kiosk operator to


obtain a copy of the receipt.



Req. No. 3305 Page 9


G. All digital asset kiosk operators shall use blockchain


technology to assist in the prevention of sending purchased digital


assets from a digital asset kiosk operator to a digital asset wallet


known to be affiliated with fraudulent activity at the time of a


transaction. The Banking Department may request evidence from any


digital asset kiosk operator of the current use of blockchain


analytics.


1. All digital asset kiosk operators shall take reasonable


steps to detect and prevent fraud, including establishing and


maintaining a written anti-fraud policy including, but not limited


to:


a. the identification and assessment of fraud-related


risk areas,


b. procedures and controls to protect against identified


risks,


c. allocation of responsibility for monitoring risks, and


d. procedures for the periodic evaluation and revision of


the anti-fraud procedures, controls, and monitoring


mechanisms.


2. Each digital asset kiosk operator shall designate and employ


a compliance officer with the following requirements:


a. the individual shall be qualified to coordinate and


monitor compliance with this act and all other



Req. No. 3305 Page 10


applicable federal and state laws, rules, and


regulations,


b. the individual shall be employed full-time by the


digital asset kiosk operator,


c. the designated compliance officer cannot be an


individual who owns more than twenty percent (20%) of


the digital asset kiosk by whom the individual is


employed, and


d. compliance responsibilities required under federal and


state laws, rules, and regulations shall be completed


by full-time employees of the digital asset kiosk


operator.


3. A digital asset kiosk operator shall issue a refund to a new


customer for the full amount of all fraudulent transactions,


including all transaction fees and charges that were charged to the


customer pursuant to subsection I of this section, made while a new


customer. To receive a refund under this section, a new customer


shall have been fraudulently induced to engage in the digital asset


transactions and shall contact the digital asset kiosk operator and


the Office of the Attorney General to report the fraudulent nature


of the transactions within fourteen (14) days of the last fraudulent


transaction to occur while the customer was a new customer.


4. A digital asset kiosk operator shall issue a refund to an


existing customer who qualifies under this paragraph for the full

Req. No. 3305 Page 11


amount of all transaction fees and charges that were charged to the


customer pursuant to subsection I of this section upon the request


of the customer. To receive a refund under this paragraph, a


customer shall have been fraudulently induced to engage in digital


asset transactions and shall contact the digital asset kiosk


operator and the Office of the Attorney General to report the


fraudulent nature of the transaction within fourteen (14) days of


the transaction.


H. A digital asset kiosk operator shall not accept transactions


of more than Two Thousand Dollars ($2,000.00), or the equivalent in


digital assets, in a single day in connection with digital asset


kiosk transactions with a new customer in this state by one or more


digital asset kiosks.


I. The aggregate fees and charges directly or indirectly


charged to a customer related to a single transaction or series of


related transactions involving digital assets effected through a


digital asset kiosk in this state, including any difference between


the price charged to a customer to buy, sell, exchange, swap, or


convert digital assets and the prevailing market value of such


digital assets at the time of such transaction, shall not exceed


fifteen percent (15%) of the United States dollar equivalent of the


digital assets involved in the transaction or transactions.


J. All digital asset kiosk operators performing business in


this state shall provide live customer service at a minimum Monday

Req. No. 3305 Page 12


through Friday from 8:00 a.m. CST to 10:00 p.m. CST. The customer


service toll-free number shall be displayed on the digital asset


kiosk or the digital asset kiosk screens.


K. The Banking Department is authorized to promulgate rules


necessary to implement the provisions of this act.


SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1531 of Title 6, unless there is


created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


Sections 2 through 19 may be known and shall be cited as the


“Oklahoma Money Transmission Modernization Act”.


SECTION 3. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1532 of Title 6, unless there is


created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


As used in this act:


1. “Acting in concert” means persons knowingly acting together


with a common goal of jointly acquiring control of a licensee;


2. “Authorized delegate” means a person a licensee designates


to engage in money transmission on behalf of the licensee;


3. “Average daily money transmission liability” means the


amount of the licensee’s outstanding money transmission obligations


in this state at the end of each day in a given period of time,


added together, and divided by the total number of days in the given


period of time. For purposes of calculating average daily money


transmission liability under this act, for any licensee required to

Req. No. 3305 Page 13


do so, the given period of time shall be the quarters ending March


31, June 30, September 30, and December 31;


4. “Closed loop stored value” means stored value that is


redeemable by the issuer only for goods or services provided by the


issuer, such issuer’s affiliate, or franchisees of the issuer or


such issuer’s affiliate, except to the extent required by applicable


law to be redeemable in cash for its cash value;


5. “Control” means:


a. a controlling influence as determined by the Insurance


Commissioner, or the power to:


(1) vote at least twenty-five percent (25%) of the


outstanding voting shares or voting interests of


a person in control of a licensee,


(2) elect or appoint a majority of key individuals or


executive officers, managers, directors,


trustees, or other persons exercising managerial


authority of a person in control of a licensee,


or


(3) exercise a controlling influence over the


management or policies of a licensee or person in


control of a licensee.


b. A presumption of control:


(1) means a person shall be presumed to exercise a


controlling influence when the person holds the

Req. No. 3305 Page 14


power to vote at least ten percent (10%) of the


outstanding voting shares or voting interests of


a licensee or person in control of a licensee,


and


(2) may be rebutted by evidence that the person who


is presumed to exercise a controlling influence


is a passive investor.


c. For purposes of determining the percentage of a person


controlled by any other person’s interest, such


percentage shall be aggregated with the interest of


any other immediate family member including, but not


limited to, the person’s spouse, parents, children,


siblings, mothers- or fathers-in-law, sons- or


daughters-in-law, brothers- or sisters-in-law, or any


other person who shares such person’s home.


d. The Commissioner shall have broad authority to


designate a person as someone who has controlling


influence if the person owns voting shares of a


licensee or if the person acts on behalf of someone


who owns voting shares of a licensee. A determination


made by the Commissioner pursuant to this paragraph


shall not be rebuttable;


6. “Currency” means coin and paper money issued by the United


States or another country that is designated as legal tender,

Req. No. 3305 Page 15


circulates, and is customarily used and accepted as a medium of


exchange in the country of issuance;


7. “Digital assets” means the same as defined in Section 1359


of Title 68 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


8. “Digital asset kiosk” means the same as defined in Section


1520 of Title 6 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


9. “Digital asset kiosk operator” means the same as defined in


Section 1520 of Title 6 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


10. “Eligible rating” means a sufficiently high rating given by


an eligible rating service. If a security has differing credit


ratings given by multiple eligible rating services, the higher


rating shall apply when determining whether the security has an


eligible rating. A sufficiently high credit rating shall be a


credit rating of any of the three highest rating categories provided


by an eligible rating service, including:


a. a long-term credit rating of A- or higher by S&P


Global,


b. a short-term credit rating of A-2, SP-2, or higher by


S&P Global, or


c. the relative equivalent rating from an eligible rating


service that does not have a rating described pursuant


to subparagraphs a and b of this paragraph;


11. “Eligible rating service” means any nationally recognized


statistical rating organization as defined by the United States

Req. No. 3305 Page 16


Securities and Exchange Commission and any other organization


designated by the Commissioner;


12. “Federally insured depository financial institution” means


a bank, credit union, industrial bank, or industrial loan company


organization under federal or state law that has federally insured


deposits;


13. “In this state” means a transaction is requested:


a. in person at a physical location in this state,


b. electronically or by phone if:


(1) the person is an individual whose residential


address is in this state, or


(2) the person is a business entity, the entity whose


principal place of business or other physical


address is in this state, or


c. has any records associated with the person that the


provider of money transmission has that indicate the


person’s location is in this state;


14. “Key individual” means an individual ultimately responsible


for establishing or directing policies and procedures of the


licensee including, but not limited to, an executive officer,


manager, director, or trustee;


15. “Material litigation” means litigation that, according to


United States generally accepted accounting principles, is


significant to a person’s financial health and would be required to

Req. No. 3305 Page 17


be disclosed in the person’s annual audited financial statements,


report to shareholders, or similar records;


16. “Money” means currency or a claim that can be converted


into currency through a financial institution, electronic payments


network, or payment system. The term includes stablecoin that:


a. is pegged to a sovereign currency,


b. is fully backed by assets held in reserve, and


c. grants a holder of the stablecoin the right to redeem


the stablecoin for sovereign currency from the issuer;


17. “Money received for transmission” means receiving money or


monetary value in the United States for transmission within or


outside the United States by electronic or other means;


18. “Money transmission” means:


a. selling or issuing payment instruments to a person


located in this state,


b. selling or issuing stored to a person located in this


state, and


c. receiving money for transmission from a person located


in this state.


Money transmission shall include payroll processing services and


shall not include the sole provision of online or telecommunication


service or network access;


19. “MSB-accredited state” means a state agency that is


accredited by the Conference of State Bank Supervisors and Money

Req. No. 3305 Page 18


Transmitter Regulators Association for money transmission licensing


and supervision;


20. “Multistate licensing process” means any agreement entered


into by and among state regulators relating to coordinated


processing of applications for money transmission licenses,


applications for the acquisition of control of a licensee, control


determinations, or notice, and information requirements for a change


of key individuals;


21. “Nationwide Multistate Licensing System” (NMLS) means the


licensing system and registry developed by the Conference of State


Bank Supervisors and the American Association of Residential


Mortgage Regulators and owned and operated by the State Regulatory


Registry, LLC, or any successor or affiliated entity, for the


licensing and registration of persons in financial services


industries;


22. “Outstanding money transmission obligations” means:


a. any payment instrument or stored value that has:


(1) been issued or sold by a money transmission


licensee to a person located in any state,


territory, or possession of the United States,


the District of Columbia, the Commonwealth of


Puerto Rico, or a United States military


installation that is located in a foreign


country,

Req. No. 3305 Page 19


(2) been reported as sold by an authorized delegate


to a person who is located in any state,


territory, or possession of the United States,


the District of Columbia, the Commonwealth of


Puerto Rico, or a United States military


installation that is located in a foreign


country, or


(3) not been paid or refunded by or for the licensee,


or escheated in accordance with applicable


abandoned property laws, or


b. money received for money transmission services by a


money transmission licensee or an authorized delegate


from a person located in any state, territory, or


possession of the United States, the District of


Columbia, the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico, or a United


States military installation that is located in a


foreign country that has not been received by the


payee or refunded to the person or escheated in


accordance with applicable abandoned property laws;


23. “Passive investor” means a person who:


a. does not have the power to elect a majority of key


individuals or executive officers, managers,


directors, trustees, or other persons exercising



Req. No. 3305 Page 20


managerial authority of a person in control of a


licensee,


b. is not employed by and does not have any managerial


duties of the licensee or person in control of a


licensee,


c. does not have the power to exercise a controlling


influence over the management or policies of a


licensee or person in control of a licensee, and


d. either attests to subparagraphs a, b, and c of this


paragraph in a form and medium prescribed by the


Commissioner or commits to the passivity


characteristics in a written document;


24. “Payment instrument” means a written or electronic check,


draft, money order, traveler’s check, or other written or electronic


instrument for the transmission or payment of money or monetary


value, whether or not negotiable. Payment instrument shall not


include stored value or any instrument that:


a. is redeemable by the issuer only for goods or services


provided by the issuer or its affiliate or franchisees


of the issuer or its affiliate, except to the extent


required by applicable law to be redeemable in cash


for its cash value, or





Req. No. 3305 Page 21


b. is not sold to the public but is issued and


distributed as part of a loyalty, rewards, or


promotional program;


25. “Payroll processing services” means receiving money for


transmission pursuant to a contract with a person to deliver wages


or salaries, make payment of payroll taxes to state and federal


agencies, make payments relating to employee benefit plans, or make


distributions of other authorized deductions from wages or salaries.


Payroll processing services shall not include an employer performing


payroll processing services on its own behalf or on behalf of its


affiliate, or a professional employer organization subject to


regulations under other applicable state law;


26. “Person” means any individual, general partnership, limited


partnership, limited liability company, corporation, trust,


association, joint stock corporation, or other corporate entity


identified by the Commissioner;


27. “Remit” means to make direct payments of money to a


licensee or the licensee’s representative authorized to receive


money or to deposit money in a bank in an account specified by the


licensee;


28. “Stored value” means monetary value representing a claim


against the issuer evidenced by an electronic or digital record, and


that is intended and accepted for use as a means of redemption for


money or monetary value, or payment for goods or services,

Req. No. 3305 Page 22


including, but not limited to, prepaid access as defined by 31


C.F.R., Section 1010.100. Stored value does not include a payment


instrument or closed loop stored value, or stored value not sold to


the public but issued and distributed as part of a loyalty, rewards,


or promotional program; and


29. “Tangible net worth” means the aggregate assets of a


licensee excluding all intangible assets, less liabilities, as


determined in accordance with United States generally accepted


accounting principles.


SECTION 4. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1533 of Title 6, unless there is


created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. This act shall not apply to:


1. An operator of a payment system to the extent that it


provides processing, clearing, or settlement services, between or


among persons or licensees exempted by this section in connection


with wire transfers, credit card transactions, debit card


transactions, stored value transactions, automated clearing house


transfers, or similar funds transfers;


2. A person appointed as an agent of a payee to collect and


process a payment from a payor to the payee for goods or services,


other than money transmission, provided to the payor by the payee,


provided that:



Req. No. 3305 Page 23


a. there exists a written agreement between the payee and


the agent directing the agent to collect and process


payments from payors on the payee’s behalf,


b. the payee holds the agent out to the public as


accepting payments for goods or services on the


payee’s behalf, and


c. payments for the goods and services are treated as


received by the payee upon receipt by the agent so


that the payor’s obligation is extinguished and there


is no risk of loss to the payor if the agent fails to


remit the funds to the payee;


3. A person that acts as an intermediary by processing payments


between an entity that has directly incurred an outstanding money


transmission obligation to a sender, and the sender’s designated


recipient, provided that the entity:


a. is properly licensed or exempt from licensing


requirements under this act,


b. provides a receipt, electronic record, or other


written confirmation to the sender identifying the


entity as provider of money transmission in the


transaction, and


c. bears sole responsibility to satisfy the outstanding


money transmission obligation to the sender, including


the obligation to make the sender whole in connection

Req. No. 3305 Page 24


with any failure to transmit the funds to the sender’s


designated recipient;


4. The United States or a department, agency, or


instrumentality or its agent;


5. Money transmission by the United States Postal Service or by


an agent of the United States Postal Service;


6. A state, county, city, or any other governmental agency or


governmental subdivision or instrumentality of a state or its agent;


7. A federally insured depository financial institution, bank


holding company, office of an international banking corporation,


foreign bank that establishes a federal branch pursuant to 12


U.S.C., Section 3102, bank service company pursuant to 12 U.S.C.,


Sections 1861 through 1867, or corporation organized under 12


U.S.C., Sections 611 through 633;


8. Electronic funds transfer or governmental benefits for a


federal, state, county, or governmental agency by a contractor on


behalf of the United States or a department, agency, or


instrumentality, or on behalf of a state or governmental


subdivision, agency, or instrumentality;


9. A board of trade designated as a contract market under 7


U.S.C., Sections 1 through 25, or a person that in the ordinary


course of business provides clearance and settlement services for a


board of trade to the extent of its operation as or for such board;



Req. No. 3305 Page 25


10. A registered futures commission merchant under the federal


commodities laws to the extent of its operations as such merchant;


11. A person registered as a securities broker-dealer under


federal or state securities laws to the extent of its operation as


such broker-dealer;


12. An individual employed by a licensee, authorized delegate,


or any person exempted from the licensing requirements of this act


when acting within the scope of employment and under the supervision


of the licensee, authorized delegate, or exempted person as an


employee and not as an independent contractor;


13. A person expressly appointed as a third-party service


provider to or agent of an entity exempt under paragraph 7 of this


subsection to the extent that:


a. such service provider or agent is engaging in money


transmission on behalf of and pursuant to a written


agreement with the exempt entity that sets forth the


specific functions that the service provider or agent


is to perform, and


b. the exempt entity assumes all risk of loss and all


legal responsibility for satisfying the outstanding


money transmission obligations owed to purchasers and


holders of the outstanding money transmission


obligations upon receipt of the purchaser’s or



Req. No. 3305 Page 26


holder’s money or monetary value by the service


provider or agent; and


14. A person exempt by regulation or order if the Insurance


Commissioner finds such exemption to be in the public interest and


that the regulation of such person is not necessary for the purposes


of this act.


B. The Commissioner may require any person claiming to be


exempt from licensing pursuant to this section to provide


information and documentation to the Commissioner demonstrating that


the person qualifies for any claimed exemption.


SECTION 5. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1534 of Title 6, unless there is


created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. The Insurance Commissioner may, subject to the provisions of


subsections C and D of this section:


1. Enter into agreements or relationships with other government


officials, federal or state regulatory agencies, or regulatory


associations to improve efficiencies and reduce regulatory burden by


standardizing methods or procedures, and sharing resources, records,


or related information obtained pursuant to this act;


2. Use, hire, contract, or employ analytical systems, methods,


or software to examine or investigate any person subject to this


act;



Req. No. 3305 Page 27


3. Accept, from other state or federal government agencies or


officials, licensing, examination, or investigation reports made by


such agencies or officials; and


4. Accept audit reports made by an independent certified public


accountant or other qualified third-party auditor for an applicant


or licensee and incorporate the audit report in any report of


examination or investigation.


B. The Commissioner shall have the authority to recover the


cost of administering and enforcing this act by imposing and


collecting proportionate and equitable fees and costs associated


with applications, examinations, or investigations.


C. Unless otherwise provided in this subsection, all


information or reports obtained by the Commissioner from an


applicant, licensee, or authorized delegate, and all information


contained in or related to an examination, investigation, operating


report, or condition report prepared by, on behalf of, or for the


use of the Commissioner, or financial statements, balance sheets, or


authorized delegate information, shall be confidential and shall not


be subject to disclosure under the Oklahoma Open Records Act. The


Commissioner may disclose information to representatives of state or


federal agencies who promise in a record that they will maintain the


confidentiality of the information or, where the Commissioner finds


that the release is reasonably necessary for the protection and


interest of the public, shall maintain confidentiality in accordance

Req. No. 3305 Page 28


with the Oklahoma Open Records Act. This subsection shall not be


construed to prohibit the Commissioner from disclosing to the public


a list of all licensees or the aggregate financial or transactional


data concerning those licensees.


D. The following information contained in the records of the


Insurance Department shall not be confidential and may be made


available to the public either on the Insurance Department’s


website, upon receipt by the Department of a written request, or in


NMLS:


1. The name, business address, telephone number, and unique


identifier of a licensee;


2. The business address of a licensee’s registered agent for


service;


3. The name, business address, and telephone number of all


authorized delegates;


4. The terms of or a copy of any bond filed by a licensee,


provided that confidential information including, but not limited


to, prices and fees for such bond is redacted;


5. Copies of any nonconfidential final order of the Department


relating to any violation of this act or regulations promulgated


pursuant to this act; and


6. Notice of the imposition of an administrative fine or


penalty under this act.



Req. No. 3305 Page 29


E. The Commissioner may conduct investigations in Oklahoma or


outside this state and the United States as the Commissioner


considers necessary or appropriate to administer and enforce this


act. For purposes of such investigation, examination, or other


proceeding under this act, the Commissioner may:


1. Administer oaths or cause oaths to be administered;


2. Compel the attendance of witnesses;


3. Require the production of any document that the Commissioner


determines to be relevant to the inquiry;


4. Subpoena witnesses; and


5. Take evidence.


F. If a person refuses to obey a subpoena, the District Court


of Oklahoma County, on application by the Commissioner, may issue an


order requiring the person to appear before the Commissioner and


produce documents or give evidence regarding the matter under


investigation.


G. The Commissioner may employ a person or request the Attorney


General, or another state, federal, or local law enforcement agency,


to assist in enforcing the provisions of this act.


H. The Commissioner may recover the reasonable costs incurred


in connection with an investigation conducted under this act from


the person that is the subject of the investigation.





Req. No. 3305 Page 30


SECTION 6. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1535 of Title 6, unless there is


created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. The Insurance Commissioner may conduct an examination or


investigation of a licensee or authorized delegate or otherwise take


independent action authorized pursuant to this act. The


Commissioner may:


1. Conduct an examination either on-site or off-site;


2. Conduct an examination in conjunction with an examination


conducted by representatives of other state or federal agencies;


3. Accept the examination report of another state or federal


agency or independent accounting firm, which upon being accepted,


shall be considered for all purposes an official report of the


Commissioner; and


4. Summon and examine under oath a key individual or employee


of a licensee or authorized delegate and require such person to


produce records regarding any matter related to the condition and


business of the licensee or authorized delegate.


B. A licensee or authorized delegate shall provide to the


Commissioner all records reasonably required to conduct a complete


examination. Such records shall be provided to the location and in


the format established by the Commissioner. The Commissioner shall


be authorized to utilize multistate record production standards and



Req. No. 3305 Page 31


examination procedures when such standards and procedures will


reasonably achieve the requirements of this section.


C. Unless otherwise directed by the Commissioner, a licensee


shall pay all costs reasonably incurred in connection with an


examination of the licensee or the licensee’s authorized delegate.


SECTION 7. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1536 of Title 6, unless there is


created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. The Insurance Commissioner shall be authorized to


participate in multistate supervisory processes established between


states and coordinated through the Conference of State Bank


Supervisors, Money Transmitter Regulators Association, or any


affiliates and successors for all licensees that hold licenses in


this state and other states. As a participant in multistate


supervision, the Commissioner may:


1. Cooperate, coordinate, and share information with other


state and federal regulators in accordance with subsections C and D


of Section 5 of this act;


2. Enter into written cooperation, coordination, or


information-sharing contracts or agreements with organizations the


membership of which is made up of state or federal governmental


agencies; and


3. Cooperate, coordinate, and share information with


organizations in which the membership is composed of state or

Req. No. 3305 Page 32


federal agencies, provided that such organizations agree in writing


to maintain the confidentiality and security of shared information


in accordance with the provisions of subsections C and D of Section


of this act.


B. The Commissioner shall not waive his or her authority to


conduct an examination or investigation or otherwise take


independent action pursuant to the provisions of this act to enforce


compliance with applicable state or federal law. Nothing in this


section shall be construed to waive the Commissioner’s authority.


C. A joint examination or investigation, or acceptance of an


examination or investigation report, shall not waive an examination


assessment provided for in this act.


D. In the event of any inconsistencies between this act and a


federal law that governs pursuant to this section, the Commissioner


may provide interpretive guidance that identifies the inconsistency


and identifies the appropriate means of compliance with federal law.


SECTION 8. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1537 of Title 6, unless there is


created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


No person shall engage in the business of money transmission or


advertise, solicit, or hold himself or herself out as providing


money transmission unless such person is licensed pursuant to this


act. This section shall not apply to any person:



Req. No. 3305 Page 33


1. That is an authorized delegate of a person licensed pursuant


to this act who is acting within the scope of authority conferred by


a written contract with the licensee; or


2. Exempt pursuant to subsection A of Section 4 of this act and


who does not engage in money transmission outside of the scope of


such exemption.


SECTION 9. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1538 of Title 6, unless there is


created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. The Insurance Commissioner shall be authorized to:


1. Implement the provisions of this act in a manner consistent


with other states that have adopted this act or multistate licensing


processes; and


2. Participate in nationwide protocols for licensing


cooperation and coordination among state regulators provided that


such protocols are consistent with this act.


B. The Commissioner shall be authorized to establish


relationships or contracts with the Nationwide Multistate Licensing


System (NMLS) or other entities designated by NMLS to:


1. Collect and maintain records;


2. Coordinate multistate licensing and supervision processes;


3. Process fees; and


4. Facilitate communication between states and licensees or


other persons subject to the provisions of this act.

Req. No. 3305 Page 34


C. The Commissioner shall be authorized to utilize NMLS for


licensing in accordance with the provisions of this act including,


but not limited to, license applications, applications for


acquisitions of control, surety bonds, reporting, criminal history


background checks, credit checks, fee processing, and examinations.


D. The Commissioner shall be authorized to utilize NMLS forms,


processes, and functionalities in accordance with the provisions of


this act. In the event NMLS does not provide functionality, forms,


or processes for a provision of this act, the Commissioner may


implement such requirements in a manner that facilitates uniformity


in licensing, supervision, reporting, and regulation of licensees


which are licensed in multiple jurisdictions.


E. The Commissioner shall be authorized to waive or modify a


rule, policy, order, or any or all of the requirements and to


establish new requirements as reasonably necessary to participate in


the Nationwide Multistate Licensing System.


SECTION 10. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1539 of Title 6, unless there is


created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. Any license issued pursuant to this act shall not be


transferable or assignable. A nonrefundable application fee of Four


Thousand Dollars ($4,000.00) and a nonrefundable license fee of


Three Thousand Dollars ($3,000.00) shall accompany such application


for a license. The Insurance Commissioner shall establish a form

Req. No. 3305 Page 35


for application for a license issued pursuant to this act. Such


form shall include, but not be limited to:


1. The legal name and residential business addresses of the


applicant and any fictitious or trade name used by the applicant in


conducting such business;


2. A list of any criminal convictions of the applicant and any


material litigation in which the applicant has been involved in the


ten-year period preceding the submission of such application;


3. A description of any money transmission previously provided


in this state;


4. A description of any money transmission the applicant seeks


to provide in this state;


5. A list of the applicant’s proposed authorized delegates and


the locations in this state where the applicant and his or her


authorized delegates propose to engage in money transmission;


6. A list of any other state in which the applicant is licensed


to engage in money transmission and any license revocations,


suspensions, or other disciplinary action taken against the


applicant in such state;


7. Information concerning any bankruptcy or receivership


proceedings affecting the applicant or person in control of the


applicant;


8. A sample form of contract for authorized delegates, as


applicable;

Req. No. 3305 Page 36


9. A sample form of payment instrument or stored value, as


applicable;


10. The name and address of any federally insured depository


financial institution through which the applicant plans to conduct


money transmissions; and


11. Any other information the Commissioner determines as


necessary.


B. If an applicant is a corporation, limited liability company,


partnership, or other legal entity, the applicant shall provide, in


addition to the information set forth in subsection A of this


section:


1. The date of the applicant’s incorporation or formation and


state or county of incorporation or formation;


2. If applicable, a certificate of good standing from the state


or county in which the applicant is incorporated or formed;


3. A brief description of the structure or organization of the


applicant, including any parents or subsidiaries of the applicant,


and whether such parents or subsidiaries are publicly traded;


4. The legal name, any fictious or trade name, all business and


residential addresses, and the employment, if applicable, in the


ten-year period preceding the submission of the application of each


key individual and person in control of the applicant;


5. A list of any criminal convictions and material litigation


in which a person in control of the applicant that is not an

Req. No. 3305 Page 37


individual has been involved in the ten-year period preceding the


submission of the application;


6. A copy of audited financial statements of the applicant for


the most recent fiscal year and for the two-year period preceding


the submission of the application or, if determined necessary by the


Commissioner, certified unaudited financial statements for the most


recent fiscal year or other period determined necessary by the


Commissioner;


7. A certified copy of unaudited financial statements of the


applicant for the most recent fiscal quarter;


8. If the applicant is a publicly traded corporation, a copy of


the most recent report filed with the United States Securities and


Exchange Commission pursuant to Section 13 of the federal Securities


Exchange Act of 1934, 15 U.S.C., Section 78m;


9. If the applicant is a wholly owned subsidiary of:


a. a copy of audited financial statements for the parent


corporation for the most recent fiscal year or a copy


of the parent corporation’s most recent report filed


pursuant to Section 13 of the federal Securities


Exchange Act of 1934, 15 U.S.C., Section 78m, for a


corporation publicly traded in the United States, or


b. a copy of similar documentation filed with the


regulator of the parent corporation’s domicile outside



Req. No. 3305 Page 38


of the United States, for a corporation publicly


traded outside of the United States;


10. The name and address of the applicant’s registered agent in


this state; and


11. Any other information the Commissioner determines as


necessary.


C. The Commissioner may waive one or more requirements set


forth in this section or permit an applicant to submit alternative


information to such waived requirement.


D. Any individual in control of a licensee or applicant, any


individual that seeks to acquire control of a licensee or applicant,


and each key individual shall furnish to the Commissioner, in a form


established by the Commissioner, through the Nationwide Multistate


Licensing System (NMLS) the following information:


1. The individual’s fingerprints for submission to the Federal


Bureau of Investigation and the Commissioner for purposes of a


national criminal history background check unless the individual has


resided outside of the United States for the previous ten (10)


years;


2. Personal history and experience including:


a. an independent credit report from a consumer reporting


agency unless the individual does not have a Social


Security number, in which case this requirement shall


be waived,

Req. No. 3305 Page 39


b. information related to any criminal convictions or


pending charges, and


c. information related to any regulatory or


administrative action and any civil litigation


involving claims of fraud, misrepresentation,


conversion, mismanagement of funds, breach of


fiduciary duty, or breach of contract; and


3. If such individual has resided outside of the United States


at any time in the last ten (10) years, the individual shall provide


an investigative background report prepared by an independent


research firm.


a. Such independent research firm shall:


(1) demonstrate it has sufficient knowledge and


resources and employs accepted and reasonable


methodologies to conduct the research of such


report, and


(2) not be affiliated with or have an interest in


such individual.


b. The report shall be written in the English language in


a form and medium as prescribed by the Commissioner


and shall contain:


(1) if available in the individual’s current


jurisdiction of residence, a comprehensive credit


report or any equivalent information obtained or

Req. No. 3305 Page 40


generated by such independent research firm,


including a search of court data in the


countries, providences, states, cities, towns,


and contiguous areas where the individual resided


and worked,


(2) criminal records information for the past ten


(10) years including, but not limited to,


felonies, misdemeanors, or similar convictions


for violations of the law in countries,


providences, states, cities, towns, and


contiguous areas where the individual resided or


worked,


(3) employment history,


(4) media history, including an electronic search of


national and local publications, wire services,


and business applications, and


(5) financial service-related regulatory history


including, but not limited to, money


transmission, securities, banking, insurance, and


mortgage-related industries.


E. When an application for a license is determined by the


Commissioner to include all items and matters required by this act,


it shall be deemed complete. The Commissioner shall notify the


applicant of the date on which the application was determined to be

Req. No. 3305 Page 41


complete and shall either approve or deny the application within one


hundred eighty (180) days after the completion date or extend the


review period.


F. The Commissioner shall, upon completion, ensure compliance


with the requirements set forth in this section and investigate the


financial condition and responsibility, financial and business


experiences, competence, character, and general fitness of the


applicant and key individuals and persons in control of the


applicant to determine that it is in the interest of the public to


permit the applicant to acquire a license. The Commissioner may


conduct an on-site investigation of the applicant and determine the


reasonable cost the applicant shall pay for such investigation.


G. If an applicant is subject to a multistate licensing


process:


1. The Commissioner may accept the investigation results of a


lead investigative state pursuant to this section; and


2. If this state is the lead investigative state, the


Commissioner may investigate the applicant pursuant to this section.


H. The Commissioner may deny a license application if the


applicant has not received approval to operate as a money


transmitter in the state in which such applicant’s main office is


located or based on the findings of another state.


I. The Commissioner shall issue a formal written notice of


denial of a license application within thirty (30) days of the

Req. No. 3305 Page 42


decision to deny the application. The Commissioner shall set forth


in such notice the specific reasons for denial of the application.


If such applicant appeals such denial, the applicant shall file an


appeal with the Banking Board within fifteen (15) calendar days


after the date of the written notice of denial.


J. The term of a license shall begin on the day the application


is approved and shall expire on December 31 of the year in which the


term began, unless the term of a license began between November 1


and December 31, in which case the license shall expire on December


of the following year.


K. All licenses shall be renewed annually and shall have an


annual renewal fee of Three Thousand Dollars ($3,000.00) and shall


be paid no more than sixty (60) days before the expiration of the


license. A licensee shall submit a renewal report with the renewal


fee in a form established by the Commissioner. The renewal report


shall include a description of each material change in information


submitted by the licensee in its original license application that


has not been reported to the Commissioner. The Commissioner may


grant an extension for the renewal of a license. The Commissioner


may utilize Nationwide Multistate Licensing System (NMLS) to process


license renewals in accordance with the provisions of this section.


The Commissioner may suspend or revoke a license in accordance with


the provisions of this act.



Req. No. 3305 Page 43


SECTION 11. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1540 of Title 6, unless there is


created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. Any persons acting in concert that are seeking to acquire


control of a licensee shall:


1. Obtain written approval by the Insurance Commissioner prior


to acquiring control. Any individual who is a key individual in the


ordinary course of business shall not be subject to the provisions


of this subsection;


2. Submit an application in a form established by the


Commissioner;


3. Submit a nonrefundable fee of Four Thousand Dollars


($4,000.00); and


4. Submit all information provided for in subsection D of


Section 10 of this act for all key individuals who have not


submitted such information.


B. The Commissioner may permit, upon request, submission of the


information provided for in this section without using Nationwide


Multistate Licensing System (NMLS).


C. When an application for a license is determined by the


Commissioner to include all items and matters required by this act,


it shall be deemed complete. The Commissioner shall notify the


applicant of the date on which the application was determined to be


complete and shall either approve or deny the application within

Req. No. 3305 Page 44


ninety (90) days after the completion date or extend the review


period.


D. The Commissioner shall not approve an application for


acquisition of control if the applicant has not received such


approval in the state in which it is organized and the main office


is located. If such application has been approved in the state in


which the applicant is organized and located and the Commissioner


has not approved or denied the application for acquisition of


control in this state after the ninety-day period, the application


shall be deemed approved.


E. The Commissioner shall, upon completion, ensure compliance


with the requirements set forth in this section and investigate the


financial condition and responsibility, financial and business


experiences, competence, character, and general fitness of the


applicant and key individuals and persons in control of the


applicant to determine that it is in the interest of the public to


permit the applicant to acquire a license.


F. If an applicant is subject to a multistate licensing


process:


1. The Commissioner may accept the investigation results of a


lead investigative state; and


2. If this state is the lead investigative state, the


Commissioner may investigate the applicant.



Req. No. 3305 Page 45


G. The Commissioner shall issue a formal written notice of


denial of a license application within thirty (30) days of the


decision to deny the application. The Commissioner shall set forth


in such notice the specific reasons for denial of the application.


If such applicant appeals such denial, the applicant shall file an


appeal with the Oklahoma State Banking Board within fifteen (15)


calendar days after the date of the written notice of denial. If


such notice is not disapproved within thirty (30) days after the


date on which the notice was determined to be complete, the notice


shall be deemed to be approved.


H. The requirements set forth in subsections A and B of this


section shall not apply to:


1. A person acting as a proxy for the sole purpose of voting at


a designated meeting of the shareholders, holders of voting shares


or voting interests of a licensee, or a person in control of a


licensee;


2. A person that acquired control of a licensee by devise or


descent;


3. A person that acquires control of a licensee as a personal


representative, custodian, guardian, conservator, trustee, or as an


officer appointed by a court of competent jurisdiction or by


operation of law;


4. A person who is exempt pursuant to the provisions of


paragraph 7 of subsection A of Section 4 of this act;

Req. No. 3305 Page 46


5. A person who has been determined by the Commissioner to be


exempt based on public interest;


6. A public offering of securities of a licensee or a person in


control of a licensee; or


7. An internal reorganization of a person in control of the


licensee where the ultimate person in control of the licensee


remains the same.


I. Any persons pursuant to paragraphs 2, 3, 4, 6, and 7 of


subsection H of this section shall notify the Commissioner within


fifteen (15) days after the acquisition of control.


J. The provisions of subsections A and B of this section shall


not apply to a person that has complied with and received approval


to engage in money transmission under this act or was identified as


a person in control in a prior application approved by the


Commissioner or by an MSB-accredited state pursuant to a multistate


licensing process, provided that:


1. The person has not had or controlled a license that has been


revoked or suspended within the previous five (5) years;


2. The person is a licensee that has been determined to be well


managed and has received at least a satisfactory rating for


compliance at the most recent examination by an MSB-accredited state


if such rating was given;





Req. No. 3305 Page 47


3. The licensee to be acquired is projected to meet the


requirements of Sections 15 and 16 of this act after the acquisition


of control is completed;


4. If the person acquiring such licensee is a licensee and such


licensee meets the requirements of Sections 16 and 17 of this act


after the acquisition of control is completed;


5. The licensee to be acquired will not implement any material


changes to the licensee’s business plan as a result of the


acquisition of control;


6. If the person acquiring control is a licensee, such licensee


will not implement any material changes to such licensee’s business


plan as a result of the acquisition of control; and


7. The person provides notice of the acquisition in cooperation


with the licensee and provides attestation of compliance with this


section in a form established by the Commissioner.


K. Before filing an application for approval to acquire control


of a licensee, a person may request in writing a determination from


the Commissioner as to whether such person would be considered a


person in control of a licensee pursuant to this section. If the


Commissioner determines such person is not considered a person in


control of a licensee, such person shall not be subject to the


provisions of this section.





Req. No. 3305 Page 48


SECTION 12. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1541 of Title 6, unless there is


created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. A licensee adding or replacing any key individual shall:


1. Provide notice in a manner determined by the Insurance


Commissioner within fifteen (15) days after the effective date of


the key individual’s appointment; and


2. Provide the information set forth in subsection D of Section


of this act within forty-five (45) days of the effective date of


the key individual’s appointment.


B. Within ninety (90) days of such notice, provided pursuant to


subsection A of this section, has been determined to be complete,


the Commissioner may issue a notice of disapproval of a key


individual if the competence, experience, character, or integrity of


the individual result in a determination that is not in the best


interests of the public or the customers of the licensee to permit


the individual to be a key individual of such licensee. Such notice


of disapproval shall contain a statement of the basis for


disapproval and shall be sent to the licensee and the disapproved


individual. If a licensee chooses to appeal such notice, the


licensee shall file an appeal with the Banking Board within fifteen


(15) calendar days after the date of the written notice. If such


notice is not disapproved or the review period has not been extended



Req. No. 3305 Page 49


within one hundred twenty (120) days after such notice was deemed


complete, the application shall be deemed approved.


C. If the key individual is subject to a multistate licensing


process:


1. The Commissioner may accept the investigation results of a


lead investigative state pursuant this section; and


2. If this state is the lead investigative state, the


Commissioner may investigate the applicant.


SECTION 13. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1542 of Title 6, unless there is


created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. Each licensee shall submit a report of condition within


forty-five (45) days of the end of the calendar quarter. Such


report shall include:


1. Financial information at the licensee level;


2. Nationwide and state-specific money transmission transaction


information in every jurisdiction in the United States where the


licensee is licensed to engage in money transmission;


3. Permissible investment reports; and


4. Any other information determined by the Insurance


Commissioner.


B. Transaction destination country reporting for money received


for transmission, if applicable, shall be submitted in such report


filed at the end of the fourth calendar quarter.

Req. No. 3305 Page 50


C. 1. Each licensee shall within ninety (90) days of the end


of each fiscal year file with the Commissioner:


a. an audited financial statement of the licensee for the


fiscal year prepared in accordance with United States


generally accepted accounting principles, and


b. any additional information requested by the


Commissioner.


2. The audited financial statements shall be prepared by an


independent certified public accountant or an independent public


accountant who has been approved by the Commissioner. The audited


financial statements shall include or be accompanied by a


certificate of opinion of such accountant, as determined


satisfactory by the Commissioner. If the certificate is qualified,


the Commissioner may order a licensee to take any action the


Commissioner determines necessary to enable such accountant to


remove the qualification.


D. Each licensee shall submit a report of authorized delegates


within forty-five (45) days of the end of the calendar quarter. The


report shall include each authorized delegate’s:


1. Company legal name;


2. Taxpayer employer identification number;


3. Principal provider identifier;


4. Physical address;


5. Mailing address;

Req. No. 3305 Page 51


6. Business conducted in other states;


7. Fictitious or trade name;


8. Contact person name, phone number, and email;


9. Start date acting as the licensee’s authorized delegate;


10. End date acting as the licensee’s authorized delegate, if


applicable;


11. Court orders; and


12. Any other information as determined by the Commissioner.


E. A licensee shall file a report with the Commissioner within


one (1) business day after any of the following:


1. The filing of a petition by or against the licensee under 11


U.S.C., Sections 101 through 110, for bankruptcy or reorganization;


2. The filing of a petition by or against the licensee for


receivership, the commencement of any other judicial or


administrative proceeding for the licensee’s dissolution or


reorganization, or the making of a general assignment for the


benefit of its creditors; or


3. The commencement of a proceeding to revoke or suspend its


licensee in a state or country in which the licensee engages in


business or is licensed.


F. A licensee shall file a report with the Commissioner within


three (3) business days after there is a known occurrence of a


felony charge or conviction of:


1. The licensee or a key individual;

Req. No. 3305 Page 52


2. A person in control of the licensee; or


3. An authorized delegate.


G. A licensee or an authorized delegate shall file all reports


required by federal currency reporting, recordkeeping, and


suspicious activity reporting requirements set forth in the Currency


and Foreign Transactions Reporting Act and any other federal and


state laws pertaining to money laundering.


H. A licensee shall maintain records for determination of


compliance with this act for a minimum of five (5) years. Such


records may be maintained in any form and may be maintained outside


of this state if they are made available to the Commissioner within


seven (7) business days of notice. All such records shall be open


to inspection by the Commissioner pursuant to Section 5 of this act.


Such records shall be as follows:


1. A record of each outstanding money transmission obligation


sold;


2. A general ledger posted at least monthly containing all


asset, liability, capital, income, and expense accounts;


3. Bank statements and bank reconciliation records;


4. Records of outstanding money transmission obligations;


5. Records of all outstanding money transmission obligations


paid within the five-year period;


6. A list of the last-known names and addresses of all of the


licensee’s authorized delegates; and

Req. No. 3305 Page 53


7. Any other records as determined by the Commissioner.


I. The Commissioner may utilize the Nationwide Multistate


Licensing System (NMLS) for the submission of reports required


pursuant to this section and may extend the time period in which a


licensee shall provide such reports.


SECTION 14. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1543 of Title 6, unless there is


created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. Before a licensee shall be authorized to conduct business


through an authorized delegate or allows a person to act as such


licensee’s authorized delegate, the licensee shall:


1. Adopt and update as necessary, written policies and


procedures reasonably designed to ensure that the licensee’s


authorized delegate complies with all applicable state and federal


laws;


2. Enter into a written contract that complies with the


provisions of subsection B of this section; and


3. Conduct a reasonable risk-based background investigation


sufficient for the licensee to determine whether the authorized


delegate has complied with all applicable state and federal laws.


B. The written contract required pursuant to paragraph 2 of


subsection A of this section shall:


1. Be signed by the licensee and the authorized delegate;



Req. No. 3305 Page 54


2. Appoint the person signing the contract as the licensee’s


authorized delegate with the authority to conduct money transmission


on behalf of the licensee;


3. Require the authorized delegate to agree to fully comply


with all applicable state and federal laws, rules, and regulations


pertaining to money transmission;


4. Require the authorized delegate to remit and handle money


and monetary value in accordance with the terms of the contract


between the licensee and the authorized delegate;


5. Impose a trust on money and monetary value net of fees


received for money transmission for the benefit of the licensee;


6. Require the authorized delegate to prepare and maintain


records as required by the provisions of this act or required by the


Insurance Commissioner;


7. Acknowledge that the authorized delegate consents to


examination or investigation by the Commissioner;


8. State that the licensee is subject to regulation by the


Commissioner and that the Commissioner may suspend or revoke an


authorized delegate designation or require the licensee to terminate


an authorized delegate designation; and


9. Acknowledge receipt of the written policies and procedures


provided pursuant to paragraph 1 of subsection A of this section.


C. If the licensee’s license is suspended, revoked,


surrendered, or expired, the licensee shall provide documentation to

Req. No. 3305 Page 55


the Commissioner within five (5) business days that the licensee has


notified all applicable authorized delegates of the licensee whose


names are in a record filed with the Commissioner. All authorized


delegates shall immediately cease to provide money transmission as


an authorized delegate of the licensee upon such notification.


D. If an authorized delegate commingles any funds received from


money transmission with any other funds or property owned or


controlled by the authorized delegate, all such funds shall be


considered held in trust in favor of the licensee in an amount equal


to the amount of money net of fees received from money transmission.


E. An authorized delegate shall not use a subdelegate to


conduct money transmission on behalf of a licensee.


F. No person shall engage in the business of money transmission


on behalf of a person not licensed under this act or not exempt


pursuant to subsection A of Section 4 of this act. Such person


shall be jointly and severally liable with the unlicensed or


nonexempt person.


SECTION 15. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1544 of Title 6, unless there is


created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. All licensees shall forward all money received for


transmission in accordance with the terms of the agreement between


the licensee and the sender unless such licensee has reasonable


belief that such sender may be a victim of fraud or that a crime or

Req. No. 3305 Page 56


violation is occurring. If a licensee fails to forward money


received for transmission in accordance with this subsection, the


licensee shall respond to inquiries by the sender with the reason


for failure, unless providing such response would constitute a


violation of state or federal law.


B. The provisions of this subsection shall not apply to money


received for transmission subject to 12 C.F.R., Part 1005, Subpart


B, or pursuant to a written agreement between the licensee and payee


to process payments for goods or services provided by the payee.


All licensees shall refund to the sender within ten (10) days of


receipt of the sender’s written request for a refund any and all


money received for transmission unless any of the following occurs:


1. The money has been forwarded within ten (10) days of when


such money was received for transmission;


2. Instructions have been given committing an equivalent amount


of money to the person designated by the sender within ten (10) days


of the date on which such money was received for transmission;


3. The agreement between the licensee and the sender instructs


the licensee to forward the money at a time more than ten (10) days


after the date on which such money was received for transmission.


If such money has not yet been forwarded in accordance with the


terms of the agreement between the licensee and the sender, the


licensee shall issue a refund in accordance with the provisions of


this act;

Req. No. 3305 Page 57


4. The refund is requested for a transaction that the licensee


has not completed based on a reasonable belief that a crime or


violation of law, rule, or regulation has occurred; or


5. The refund request does not enable the licensee to identify


the sender’s name, address, or telephone number or the particular


transaction to be refunded in the event the sender has multiple


transactions outstanding.


C. 1. The provisions of this subsection shall not apply to:


a. money received for transmission subject to 12 C.F.R.,


Part 1005, Subpart B,


b. money received for transmission that is not primarily


for personal, family, or household purposes,


c. money received for transmission pursuant to a written


agreement between the licensee and payee to process


payments for goods or services provided by the payee,


or


d. payroll processing services.


2. Every licensee or such licensee’s authorized delegate shall


provide the sender a receipt for money received for transmission.


For a transaction conducted in person, the receipt may be provided


electronically if the sender requests or agrees to receive an


electronic receipt. For a transaction conducted electronically or


by phone, a receipt may be provided electronically. All electronic


receipts shall be provided in a retainable form. Such receipt shall

Req. No. 3305 Page 58


be in English and in the language principally used by the licensee


or authorized delegate to advertise, solicit, or negotiate for a


transaction conducted, if other than English. Such receipt shall


contain:


a. the name of the sender,


b. the name of the designated recipient,


c. the date of the transaction,


d. the unique transaction or identification number,


e. the name of the licensee, Nationwide Multistate


Licensing System (NMLS) Unique Identifier, the


licensee’s business address, and the licensee’s


customer service telephone number,


f. the amount of the transaction in United States


dollars,


g. any fee charged by the licensee to the sender for the


transaction, and


h. any taxes collected by the licensee from the sender


for the transaction.


D. A licensee that provides payroll processing services shall


issue reports to clients detailing client payroll obligations in


advance of the payroll funds being deducted from an account and make


available worker paystubs or an equivalent statement to workers.


This section shall not apply to a licensee providing payroll


processing services where the licensee’s client designates the

Req. No. 3305 Page 59


intended recipients to the licensee and is responsible for providing


the disclosures required by this section.


E. Nothing in this section shall be construed to alter the


disclosures required by Section 1520.1 of Title 6 of the Oklahoma


Statutes.


SECTION 16. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1545 of Title 6, unless there is


created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. A licensee established pursuant to this act shall maintain a


tangible net worth as established by this subsection. Such tangible


net worth shall be demonstrated by the licensee at initial


application by the application’s most recent audited or unaudited


financial statements pursuant to paragraphs 6 and 7 of subsection B


of Section 10 of this act. The Insurance Commissioner shall have


the authority to exempt any applicant from the provisions of this


subsection. Such tangible net worth shall be the greater of:


1. One Hundred Thousand Dollars ($100,000.00);


2. Three percent (3%) of total assets for One Hundred Million


Dollars ($100,000,000.00);


3. Two percent (2%) of additional assets for One Hundred


Million Dollars ($100,000,000.00) to One Billion Dollars


($1,000,000,000.00); or


4. Five percent (5%) of additional assets for over One Billion


Dollars ($1,000,000,000.00).

Req. No. 3305 Page 60


B. An applicant for a money transmission license shall provide


and maintain security consisting of a surety bond in a form


established by the Commissioner or, with approval by the


Commissioner, a deposit of such amount. A licensee may exceed the


maximum required bond amount established pursuant to paragraph 5 of


subsection A of Section 18 of this act. The Commissioner may


increase the amount of security required to a maximum of One Million


Dollars ($1,000,000.00) based on the financial condition of a


licensee including, but not limited to, net worth or financial


losses. Such security shall be:


1. If an applicant or licensee operates digital asset kiosks or


provides services related to digital assets, less than Five Hundred


Thousand Dollars ($500,000.00); or


2. If an applicant or licensee does not operate digital asset


kiosks or provide services related to digital assets, the greater


of:


a. Two Hundred Thousand Dollars ($200,000.00),


b. one hundred percent (100%) of the licensee’s average


daily money transmission liability in this state,


calculated for the most recently completed three-month


period, up to a maximum of Five Hundred Thousand


Dollars ($500,000.00), or





Req. No. 3305 Page 61


c. Two Hundred Thousand Dollars ($200,000.00) if the


licensee’s tangible net worth exceeds ten percent


(10%) of total assets.


SECTION 17. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1546 of Title 6, unless there is


created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. A licensee shall maintain permissible investments that have


a market value computed in accordance with United States generally


accepted accounting principles of not less than the aggregate amount


of all its outstanding money transmission obligations.


B. Except for permissible investments set forth in Section 18


of this act, the Insurance Commissioner may limit the extent to


which a specific investment maintained by a licensee within a class


of permissible investments may be considered a permissible


investment, if the specific investment represents undue risk to


customers not reflected in the market value of investments.


C. Permissible investments shall be subject to attachment, levy


of execution, or sequestration by order of any court except for a


beneficiary of such trust, even if commingled with other assets of


the licensee, held in trust for the benefit of the purchasers and


holders of the licensee’s outstanding money transmission obligations


in the event of insolvency, the filing of a petition by or against


the licensee under 11 U.S.C., Sections 101 through 110, for


bankruptcy or reorganization, the filing of a petition by or against

Req. No. 3305 Page 62


the licensee for receivership, the commencement of any other


judicial or administrative proceedings for its dissolution or


reorganization, or in the event of an action by a creditor against


the licensee who is not a beneficiary of such statutory trust.


D. The Commissioner shall notify the applicable regulator of


each state in which the licensee is licensed to engage in money


transmission upon the establishment of a statutory trust, or when


any funds are drawn on a letter of credit pursuant to paragraph 7 of


subsection A of Section 18 of this act. Such notice may be


performed pursuant to a multistate agreement or though the


Nationwide Multistate Licensing System (NMLS). Funds drawn on a


letter of credit, and any other permissible investments held in


trust for the benefit of the purchasers and holders of the


licensee’s outstanding money transmission obligations, shall be


deemed held in trust for the benefit of such purchasers and holders


on a pro rata and equitable basis in accordance with state or


federal law. Any statutory trust shall be terminated upon


extinguishment of all the licensee’s outstanding money transmission


obligations.


E. The Commissioner may allow other types of investments


determined to be of sufficient liquidity and quality to be


considered a permissible investment pursuant to this section. The


Commissioner shall be authorized to work with other state regulators



Req. No. 3305 Page 63


to determine such investments are of sufficient liquidity and


quality.


SECTION 18. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1547 of Title 6, unless there is


created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. The following investments shall be permissible pursuant to


Section 17 of this act:


1. Cash including demand deposits, savings deposits, and funds


in such accounts held for the benefit of the licensee’s customers in


a federally insured depository financial institution;


2. Cash equivalents including Automated Clearing House (ACH)


items in transit to the licensee and ACH items or international


wires in transit to a payee, cash in transit via armored car, smart


safes, licensee-owned locations, debit card or credit card funded


transmission receivables owed by any bank or money market mutual


funds rated AAA by S&P Global, or the equivalent from any eligible


rating service;


3. Certificates of deposit or senior debt obligations of an


insured depository institution or insured credit union as defined by


U.S.C., Section 1813 or 12 U.S.C., Section 1752;


4. An obligation:


a. of the United States or a commission, agency, or


instrumentality,



Req. No. 3305 Page 64


b. that is guaranteed fully as to principal and interest


by the United States, or


c. of a state or a governmental subdivision, agency, or


instrumentality;


5. One hundred percent (100%) of the surety bond or deposit


pursuant to subsection B of Section 16 of this act which shall


exceed the average daily money transmission liability in this state;


6. Stablecoin, to the extent of outstanding transmission


obligations received by the licensee in the same kind of stablecoin.


Such stablecoin shall be held, stored, or kept in custody of the


licensee or by a third-party custodian that meets the qualifications


established by the Insurance Commissioner; and


7. The fully drawable amount of an irrevocable standby letter


of credit for which the stated beneficiary is the Commissioner, that


stipulates that the beneficiary need only draw a sight draft under


the letter of credit and present it to obtain funds up to the letter


of credit amount within seven (7) days of presentation of the items


required pursuant this paragraph.


a. Such letter of credit shall:


(1) be issued by a federally insured depository


financial institution, a foreign bank that is


authorized under federal law to maintain a


federal agency or federal branch office in a


state or states, or a foreign bank that is

Req. No. 3305 Page 65


authorized under state law to maintain a branch


in a state that bears an eligible rating or whose


parent company bears an eligible rating and is


regulated, supervised, and examined by United


States federal or state authorities having


regulatory authority over banks, credit unions,


and trust companies,


(2) be irrevocable and unconditional, and indicate


that it is not subject to any condition or


qualification outside of the letter of credit,


(3) not contain reference to any other agreements,


documents, or entities, or otherwise provide for


any security interest in the licensee,


(4) contain an issue date and expiration date and


expressly provide for automatic extension without


a written amendment for an additional period of


one (1) year from the present or each future


expiration date, unless the issuer of the letter


of credit notifies the Commissioner in writing at


least sixty (60) days prior to any expiration


date that the irrevocable letter of credit will


not be extended, and


(5) provide that the issuer of the letter of credit


will honor, at sight, a presentation made by the

Req. No. 3305 Page 66


beneficiary to the issuer of the following


documents on or prior to the expiration date of


the letter of credit. The original letter of


credit, including any amendments, shall include a


written statement from the beneficiary stating


that any of the following events have occurred:


(a) the filing of a petition by or against the


licensee under 11 U.S.C., Sections 101


through 110, for bankruptcy or


reorganization,


(b) the filing of a petition by or against the


licensee for receivership, or the


commencement of any other judicial or


administrative proceeding for its


dissolution or reorganization,


(c) the seizure of assets of a licensee by the


Commissioner pursuant to an emergency order


issued in accordance with applicable law, on


the basis of an action, violation, or


condition that has caused or is likely to


cause the insolvency of the licensee, or


(d) the beneficiary has received notice of


expiration or non-extension of a letter of


credit and the licensee failed to

Req. No. 3305 Page 67


demonstrate to the satisfaction of the


beneficiary that the licensee will maintain


permissible investments in accordance with


subsection A of Section 17 of this act upon


the expiration or non-extension of the


letter of credit.


b. In the event of any notice of expiration or non-


extension of a letter of credit issued pursuant to


division (4) of subparagraph a of this paragraph, the


licensee shall be required to demonstrate to the


Commissioner fifteen (15) days prior to expiration,


that the licensee maintains and will maintain


permissible investments in accordance with the


provisions of subsection A of Section 17 of this act


upon such expiration. If the licensee is not able to


provide such demonstration, the Commissioner may draw


on the letter of credit in an amount up to the amount


necessary to meet the licensee’s requirements to


maintain such permissible investments. Any such draw


shall be offset against the licensee’s outstanding


money transmission obligations. Such drawn funds


shall be held in trust by the Commissioner or the


Commissioner’s designated agent, to the extent


authorized by law, as agent or the benefit of the

Req. No. 3305 Page 68


purchasers and holders of the licensee’s outstanding


money transmission obligations.


c. The Commissioner may designate an agent to serve on


the Commissioner’s behalf as beneficiary to a letter


of credit so long as the agent and letter of credit


meet requirements established by the Commissioner.


Such agent may serve as an agent for multiple


licensing authorities for a single irrevocable letter


of credit if the proceeds of the drawable amount


pursuant to subparagraph a of this paragraph are


assigned to the Commissioner.


d. In the event of any notice of expiration or non-


extension of a letter of credit issued pursuant to


division (4) of subparagraph a of this paragraph, the


licensee shall be required to demonstrate fifteen (15)


days prior to expiration of such letter of credit,


that the licensee maintains and will maintain


permissible investments pursuant to subsection A of


Section 17 of this act upon such expiration or non-


extension. If the licensee fails to demonstrate such


maintenance, the Commissioner may draw on the letter


of credit in an amount determined by the Commissioner


to meet the licensee’s requirements to maintain


permissible investments. Such draw shall be offset

Req. No. 3305 Page 69


against the licensee’s outstanding money transmission


obligations. Such draw funds shall be held in trust


by the Commissioner or the Commissioner’s designated


agent, to the extent authorized by law, as agent for


the benefit of the purchasers and holders of the


licensee’s outstanding money transmission obligations.


e. The Commissioner may participate in multistate


processes designed to facilitate the issuance and


administration of letters of credit including, but not


limited to, services provided by Nationwide Multistate


Licensing System (NMLS) and the State Regulatory


Registry, LLC.


B. Unless otherwise permitted by the Commissioner, the


following investments shall be permissible to the limits specified:


1. Receivables that are payable to the licensee from such


licensee’s authorized delegates in the ordinary course of business


that are less than seven (7) days old, not to exceed fifty percent


(50%) of the aggregate value of the licensee’s total permissible


investments;


2. Receivables, pursuant to paragraph 2 of subsection A of this


section, payable to a licensee from a single authorized delegate in


the ordinary course of business, not to exceed ten percent (10%) of


the aggregate value of the licensee’s total permissible investment;



Req. No. 3305 Page 70


3. The following investments, not to exceed twenty percent


(20%) each:


a. a short-term investment, up to six (6) months, bearing


an eligible rating,


b. commercial paper bearing an eligible rating,


c. a bill, note, bond, or debenture bearing an eligible


rating,


d. United States tri-party repurchase agreements


collateralized at one hundred percent (100%) or more


with United States government or agency securities,


municipal bonds, or other securities bearing an


eligible rating,


e. money market mutual funds rated less than an AAA


rating and equal to or higher than an A- rating by S&P


Global, or the equivalent from any other eligible


rating service, or


f. a mutual fund or other investment fund composed solely


of one or more permissible investments pursuant to


subsection A of this section; and


4. Cash, including demand deposits, savings deposits, and funds


in such accounts held for the benefit of the licensee’s customers,


at foreign depository institutions, not to exceed ten percent (10%)


of the aggregate value of the licensee’s total permissible



Req. No. 3305 Page 71


investments if the licensee has received a satisfactory rating in


its most recent examination and such foreign depository institution:


a. has an eligible rating,


b. is registered under pursuant to 26 U.S.C., Sections


1471 through 1474,


c. is not located in any country subject to sanctions


from the Office of Foreign Asset Control, and


d. is not located in a high-risk or noncooperative


jurisdiction as designated by the Financial Action


Task Force.


SECTION 19. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1548 of Title 6, unless there is


created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. The Insurance Commissioner may suspend or revoke a license


or order a licensee to revoke the designation of an authorized


delegate if:


1. The licensee violates any provisions of this act;


2. The licensee does not cooperate with an examination or


investigation by the Commissioner;


3. The licensee engages in fraud, intentional


misrepresentation, or gross negligence;


4. An authorized delegate is convicted of a violation of state


or federal anti-money laundering law, or violated a rule adopted or



Req. No. 3305 Page 72


an order issued pursuant to this act, as a result of the licensee’s


willful misconduct or blindness;


5. The competence, experience, character, or general fitness of


the licensee, authorized delegate, person in control of a licensee,


key individual, or responsible person of the authorized delegate


indicates that it is not in the public interest to permit the person


to provide money transmission;


6. The licensee engages in an unsafe or unsound practice;


7. The licensee is insolvent, suspends payment of the


licensee’s obligations, or makes a general assignment for the


benefit of the licensee’s creditors;


8. The licensee does not remove an authorized delegate after


the Commissioner issues and serves upon the licensee a final order


including a finding that the authorized delegate has violated this


act; or


9. The licensee’s license has been suspended or revoked in


another state.


B. The Commissioner may suspend or revoke the designation of an


authorized delegate if:


1. The authorized delegate violates the provisions of this act;


2. The authorized delegate did not cooperate with an


examination or investigation by the Commissioner;


3. The authorized delegate engaged in fraud, intentional


misrepresentation, or gross negligence;

Req. No. 3305 Page 73


4. The authorized delegate is convicted of a violation of state


or federal anti-money laundering law;


5. The competence, experience, character, or general fitness of


the authorized delegate or a person in control of the authorized


delegate indicates that it is not in the public interest to permit


the authorized delegate to provide money transmission; or


6. The authorized delegate is engaging in an unsafe or unsound


practice.


C. An authorized delegate may apply for relief from a


suspension or revocation of designation as an authorized delegate


through procedures established by the Commissioner.


D. The Commissioner may consider the size and condition of the


licensee’s money transmission, the magnitude of the loss, the


gravity of the violation, and the licensee’s previous conduct when


determining whether a licensee or authorized delegate is engaging in


unsafe or unsound practices.


E. If the Commissioner determines that a violation of the


provisions of this act is likely to cause immediate or irreparable


harm to the licensee, the licensee’s customers, or the public, or


cause insolvency or significant dissipation of assets of the


licensee, the Commissioner may issue a cease and desist order. The


Commissioner may issue a cease and desist order against a licensee


for providing money transmission through an authorized delegate that


is the subject of a separate order by the Commissioner. Such cease

Req. No. 3305 Page 74


and desist order shall be effective upon service upon the licensee


or authorized delegate, shall remain effective and enforceable


pending the completion of administrative proceedings, and shall


become permanent unless the licensee or authorized delegate files an


appeal with the Banking Board within fifteen (15) calendar days


after the date of the order.


F. The Commissioner may enter into a consent order at any time


with a person to resolve a matter that has arisen due to the


provisions of this act. Such consent order shall be signed by the


person to whom it is issued or by the person’s authorized


representative and shall indicate agreement with the terms contained


in the order. A consent order may provide that such order does not


constitute an admission by a person that the provisions of this act


have been violated. A consent order shall be a final order and may


not be appealed.


G. A person that intentionally makes a false statement,


misrepresentation, or false certification in a record filed or


required to be maintained pursuant to this act, that intentionally


makes a false entry or omits a material entry in such a record, or


engages in an activity for which a license is required pursuant to


this act without having been licensed shall be guilty of a Class D1


felony.


H. The Commissioner may assess a fine against a person that


violates the provisions of this act in an amount not to exceed Five

Req. No. 3305 Page 75


Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00) per violation for each day a violation


is outstanding, plus the Insurance Department’s and this state’s


costs and expenses for the investigation and prosecution of the


matter, including reasonable attorney fees.


I. The Commissioner may issue a cease and desist order if he or


she has reason to believe that a person has violated the provisions


of Section 8 of this act. Such cease and desist order shall become


effective upon service upon such person, shall remain effective and


enforceable pending the completion of administrative proceedings,


and shall become permanent unless the licensee or authorized


delegate files an appeal with the Board within fifteen (15) calendar


days after the date of such order. The Commissioner may petition


the District Court of Oklahoma County for the issuance of a


temporary restraining order ex parte in an emergency.


J. The Commissioner shall be authorized to establish rules


necessary for the provisions of this act.


SECTION 20. AMENDATORY Section 14, Chapter 366, O.S.L.


2024 (21 O.S. Supp. 2025, Section 20N), is amended to read as


follows:


Section 20N. A. Upon the effective date of this act On or


after January 1, 2026, Class D1 shall include the following criminal


offenses:


1. Public warehouse and/or or commodity stock fraud, as


provided for in Section 9-34 of Title 2 of the Oklahoma Statutes;

Req. No. 3305 Page 76


2. False issuance of warehouse receipt, as provided for in


Section 9-35 of Title 2 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


3. Misrepresentation of charter, as provided for in Section 9-


of Title 2 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


4. Tampering with anhydrous equipment, as provided for in


subsection A of Section 11-10 of Title 2 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


5. Willfully burn forest, grass, crops, or woodlands, as


provided for in Section 16-25 of Title 2 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


6. Willful and unlawful burning of forest, grass, croplands,


rangeland, or other wild lands by owner, as provided for in Section


16-28.1 of Title 2 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


7. Possession of incendiary device with the intent to burn, as


provided for in Section 16-34 of Title 2 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


8. Operate aircraft not registered with the Federal Aviation


Administration Office of Aircraft Registry or foreign country, as


provided for in subsection A of Section 258 of Title 3 of the


Oklahoma Statutes;


9. Supply false information in regard to aircraft ownership, as


provided for in subsection B of Section 258 of Title 3 of the


Oklahoma Statutes;


10. Concealing identity of aircraft, as provided for in


subsection C of Section 258 of Title 3 of the Oklahoma Statutes;





Req. No. 3305 Page 77


11. Destruction of registration or serial number on aircraft,


as provided for in subsection A of Section 259 of Title 3 of the


Oklahoma Statutes;


12. Destruction of registration or serial number on aircraft


with intent to conceal, as provided for in subsection B of Section


259 of Title 3 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


13. Sell, purchase, or possess aircraft with removed or


falsified identification number with intent to misrepresent the


identity of aircraft, as provided for in subsection D of Section 259


of Title 3 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


14. Operating aircraft under the influence of alcohol, second


or subsequent offense within ten (10) years, as provided for in


subsection A of Section 301 of Title 3 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


15. Operating aircraft under the influence of intoxicant,


second or subsequent offense with ten (10) years, as provided for in


subsection A of Section 301 of Title 3 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


16. Unauthorized use of aircraft, as provided for in subsection


A of Section 321 of Title 3 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


17. Charge fee for horse race without a license, as provided


for in Section 205 of Title 3A of the Oklahoma Statutes;


18. Pari-mutuel wagering without a license, as provided for in


subsection A of Section 208.4 of Title 3A of the Oklahoma Statutes;


19. Entering racehorse under false name, as provided for in


subsection A of Section 208.6 of Title 3A of the Oklahoma Statutes;

Req. No. 3305 Page 78


20. Entering racehorse without name being registered, as


provided for in subsection B of Section 208.6 of Title 3A of the


Oklahoma Statutes;


21. Using racing stimulating devices, as provided for in


Section 208.7 of Title 3A of the Oklahoma Statutes;


22. Racetrack bribery or ticket falsification, as provided for


in Section 208.8 of Title 3A of the Oklahoma Statutes;


23. Unauthorized wagering on horse racing, as provided for in


Section 208.9 of Title 3A of the Oklahoma Statutes;


24. Falsification of information on racehorse, as provided for


in Section 208.10 of Title 3A of the Oklahoma Statutes;


25. Administer a drug or medication without authorization to


horse prior to racing, as provided for in subsection C of Section


208.11 of Title 3A of the Oklahoma Statutes;


26. Violation of horse racing drug provisions, as provided for


in subsection D of Section 208.11 of Title 3A of the Oklahoma


Statutes;


27. Forging and/or or counterfeiting state lottery ticket, as


provided for in subsection A of Section 727 of Title 3A of the


Oklahoma Statutes;


28. Influence lottery win by fraud, as provided for in


subsection B of Section 727 of Title 3A of the Oklahoma Statutes;


29. Own dog that attacks and kills a person, as provided for in


subsection B of Section 42.4 of Title 4 of the Oklahoma Statutes;

Req. No. 3305 Page 79


30. Release dog on law enforcement officer, as provided for in


subsection C of Section 42.4 of Title 4 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


31. Pledging assets of bank as collateral, as provided in


Section 809 of Title 6 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


32. Unlawful compensation of bank officer, as provided for in


Section 1405 of Title 6 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


33. Receipt of deposits while insolvent, as provided for in


Section 1406 of Title 6 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


34. Unlawful service as bank officer or director, as provided


for in Section 1407 of Title 6 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


35. Serving as bank commissioner, administrative assistant, or


assistant banking commissioner with a felony conviction, as provided


for in Section 1408 of Title 6 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


36. Concealing bank transaction, as provided for in Section


1409 of Title 6 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


37. Improper maintenance of accounts or false or deceptive


entries and statements, as provided for in Section 1410 of Title 6


of the Oklahoma Statutes;


38. Payment of penalties and judgments against others, as


provided for in Section 1411 of Title 6 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


39. Embezzlement of bank funds, as provided for in Section 1412


of Title 6 of the Oklahoma Statutes;





Req. No. 3305 Page 80


40. Circulation of statement or representation for the purpose


of injuring any bank institution, as provided for in Section 1413 of


Title 6 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


41. Authorizing, executing, or ratifying a criminal offense, as


provided for in subsection A of Section 1414 of Title 6 of the


Oklahoma Statutes;


42. Violation of any lawful order of the Board or Commissioner,


as provided for in subsection C of Section 1414 of Title 6 of the


Oklahoma Statutes;


43. Bank advertising with confusingly similar name, as provided


for in subsection A of Section 1417 of Title 6 of the Oklahoma


Statutes;


44. Using shortened confusingly similar name for advertising,


as provided for in subsection B of Section 1417 of Title 6 of the


Oklahoma Statutes;


45. Acquiring another bank but using former name, as provided


for in subsection C of Section 1417 of Title 6 of the Oklahoma


Statutes;


46. Non-banking business using confusingly similar name, as


provided for in subsection D of Section 1417 of Title 6 of the


Oklahoma Statutes;


47. Intentionally making false statement, misrepresentation,


false certification, or false entry or engages in money transmission



Req. No. 3305 Page 81


without a license, as provided for in subsection G of Section 19 of


this act;


48. Registered sex offender providing services in a child care


facility, as provided for in subsection F of Section 404.1 of Title


of the Oklahoma Statutes;


48. 49. Failure to report child abuse, as provided for in


subsection C of Section 1-2-101 of Title 10A of the Oklahoma


Statutes;


49. 50. Interception of wire, oral, or electronic


communication, as provided for in paragraph 1 of Section 176.3 of


Title 13 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


50. 51. Using devices to intercept oral communication, as


provided for in paragraph 2 of Section 176.3 of Title 13 of the


Oklahoma Statutes;


51. 52. Disclosing contents of wire, oral, or electronic


communication, as provided for in paragraph 3 of Section 176.3 of


Title 13 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


52. 53. Using contents of wire, oral, or electronic


communication, as provided for in paragraph 4 of Section 176.3 of


Title 13 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


53. 54. Removing, injuring, or obstructing telephone line, as


provided for in paragraph 5 of Section 176.3 of Title 13 of the


Oklahoma Statutes;



Req. No. 3305 Page 82


54. 55. Carrying devices for interception of wire, oral, or


electronic communication, as provided for in paragraph 6 of Section


176.3 of Title 13 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


55. 56. Making devices for interception of wire, oral, or


electronic communication, as provided for in paragraph 7 of Section


176.3 of Title 13 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


56. 57. Using communication facility in committing felonies, as


provided for in paragraph 8 of Section 176.3 of Title 13 of the


Oklahoma Statutes;


57. 58. Violation of the Oklahoma Consumer Protection Act, as


provided for in Section 753 of Title 15 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


58. 59. Violation of the Home Repair Fraud Act, as provided for


in Section 765.3 of Title 15 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


59. 60. Conduct closing-out sale without license, as provided


for in Section 767 of Title 15 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


60. 61. Violation of the Unlawful Electronic Mail Act, as


provided for in Section 776.1 of Title 15 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


61. 62. Violation of the Unlawful Electronic Mail Act for


commercial electronic mail, as provided for in Section 776.6 of


Title 15 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


62. 63. Conceal or destroy corporation records, as provided for


in Section 16 of Title 17 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


63. 64. Misapplication of funds, as provided for in Section 411


of Title 18 of the Oklahoma Statutes;

Req. No. 3305 Page 83


64. 65. Solicit funds to secure old age assistance by deception


or fraud, as provided for in Section 553.1 of Title 18 of the


Oklahoma Statutes;


65. 66. Inspector, judge, or clerk refusing to extend or


enforce the right to sign and deliver the certificate of election


votes, as provided for in Section 90 of Title 19 of the Oklahoma


Statutes;


66. 67. Knowing and willful failure or refusal to perform


duties, as provided for in Section 91 of Title 19 of the Oklahoma


Statutes;


67. 68. County officer failing to make daily deposit, as


provided for in Section 682 of Title 19 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


68. 69. Use of false or illegal voucher by county official, as


provided for in Section 686 of Title 19 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


69. 70. Gift to influence legislator, as provided for in


Section 318 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;


70. 71. Legislator receiving payoff for employment of other, as


provided for in Section 321 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes


this title;


71. 72. Lobbying legislature on contingency fee basis, as


provided for in Section 334 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes


this title;





Req. No. 3305 Page 84


72. 73. Furnishing public supplies for profit, as provided for


in subsection A of Section 355 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes


this title;


73. 74. Purchase public supplies from business that employs


family member or spouse with more than five percent (5%) interest,


as provided for in subsection C of Section 355 of Title 21 of the


Oklahoma Statutes this title;


74. 75. Make false claim against the state, as provided for in


subsection A of Section 358 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes


this title;


75. 76. Bribing an officer, as provided for in Section 381 of


Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;


76. 77. Bribing participant or official in athletic contest, as


provided for in Section 399 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes


this title;


77. 78. Engaging in pattern of criminal offenses, as provided


for in Section 425 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;


78. 79. Escape from county or city jail, as provided for in


subsection A of Section 443 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes


this title;


79. 80. Escape from the Department of Corrections or


alternative incarceration, as provided for in subsection B of


Section 443 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;



Req. No. 3305 Page 85


80. 81. Escape from juvenile detention facility, as provided


for in subsection E of Section 443 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma


Statutes this title;


81. 82. Unauthorized entry into penal institution or jail, as


provided for in Section 445 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes


this title;


82. 83. Preparing false evidence, as provided for in Section


453 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;


83. 84. Bribing witness to falsely testify, as provided for in


Section 456 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;


84. 85. Larceny or destruction of records by clerk or officer,


as provided for in Section 461 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes


this title;


85. 86. Larceny or destruction of records by person other than


officers, as provided for in Section 462 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma


Statutes this title;


86. 87. Offer forged or false instruments for the record, as


provided for in Section 463 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes


this title;


87. 88. Perjury, as provided for in Section 491 of Title 21 of


the Oklahoma Statutes this title;


88. 89. Contradictory statements as perjury, as provided for in


Section 496 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;



Req. No. 3305 Page 86


89. 90. Perjury by subornation, as provided for in Section 504


of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;


90. 91. Falsify public record, as provided for in Section 531


of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;


91. 92. Fortifying access point to place where felony is being


committed, as provided for in Section 540C of Title 21 of the


Oklahoma Statutes this title;


92. 93. Compounding a crime, as provided for in Section 543 of


Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;


93. 94. Substitute a child to deceive a parent or guardian, as


provided for in Section 579 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes


this title;


94. 95. Record, listen to, or observe jury proceedings, as


provided for in Section 588 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes


this title;


95. 96. Abuse, sexual abuse, or exploitation of a vulnerable


adult, as provided for in subsection A of Section 843.3 of Title 21


of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;


96. 97. Neglect of a vulnerable adult, as provided for in


subsection B of Section 843.3 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes


this title;


97. 98. Procuring an abortion, as provided for in Section 861


of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;



Req. No. 3305 Page 87


98. 99. Adultery, as provided for in Section 871 of Title 21 of


the Oklahoma Statutes this title;


99. 100. Bigamy, as provided for in Section 881 of Title 21 of


the Oklahoma Statutes this title;


100. 101. Knowingly marrying a bigamist, as provided for in


Section 884 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;


101. 102. Confidence game by cards, as provided for in Section


954 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;


102. 103. Dealing in gambling devices, as provided for in


Section 984 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;


103. 104. Install communication of gambling information, as


provided for in Section 986 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes


this title;


104. 105. Dissemination of gambling information, as provided


for in Section 987 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;


105. 106. Conspiracy to violate gambling laws, as provided for


in Section 988 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;


106. 107. Engaging in prostitution while HIV-infected, as


provided for in subsection B of Section 1031 of Title 21 of the


Oklahoma Statutes this title;


107. 108. Engage in or operate prostitution within one thousand


(1,000) feet of a school or church, as provided for in subsection D


of Section 1031 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;



Req. No. 3305 Page 88


108. 109. Interactive computer service provider failing to


remove child pornography, third or subsequent offense, as provided


for in Section 1040.80 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this


title;


109. 110. Gain or attempt to gain value from nonconsensual


dissemination of private sexual images, as provided for in


subsection G of Section 1040.13b of Title 21 of the Oklahoma


Statutes this title;


110. 111. Sex offender entering safety zone around school, as


provided for in Section 1125 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes


this title;


111. 112. Unlawful removal of dead body, as provided for in


Section 1161 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;


112. 113. Purchasing or receiving dead body, as provided for in


Section 1162 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;


113. 114. Using photographic, electronic, or video equipment in


clandestine manner, as provided for in subsection B of Section 1171


of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


114. 115. Obscene, threatening, or harassing phone call, second


or subsequent offense, as provided for in Section 1172 of Title 21


of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;


115. 116. Spreading infectious diseases, as provided for in


Section 1192 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;



Req. No. 3305 Page 89


116. 117. Altering livestock appearance for exhibition, second


or subsequent offense, as provided for in Section 1229 of Title 21


of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;


117. 118. Unlawfully transport hazardous waste, as provided for


in Section 1230.3 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;


118. 119. Unlawful waste management, as provided for in Section


1230.4 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;


119. 120. False statements and acts concerning permits and


waste, as provided for in Section 1230.5 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma


Statutes this title;


120. 121. Unlawful disposal of hazardous waste, as provided for


in Section 1230.6 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;


121. 122. Attempts to violate the Sabotage Prevention Act, as


provided for in Section 1265.4 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes


this title;


122. 123. Carry weapon with intent to injure another, as


provided for in Section 1278 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes


this title;


123. 124. Teaching, demonstrating, or training use of firearms


in furtherance of riot, as provided for in Section 1320.10 of Title


of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;


124. 125. Delivering fraudulent bill of lading, as provided for


in Section 1411 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;



Req. No. 3305 Page 90


125. 126. Maintaining fraudulent warehouse receipts, as


provided for in Section 1412 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes


this title;


126. 127. Issuing duplicate bills of lading or warehouse


receipts, as provided for in Section 1414 of Title 21 of the


Oklahoma Statutes this title;


127. 128. Selling goods without consent of holder of bill of


lading, as provided for in Section 1415 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma


Statutes this title;


128. 129. Unlawful delivery of goods, value from Two Thousand


Five Hundred Dollars ($2,500.00) to Fifteen Thousand Dollars


($15,000.00), as provided for in paragraph 3 of Section 1416 of


Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;


129. 130. Burglary in the third degree, as provided for in


subsection B of Section 1435 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes


this title;


130. 131. Embezzlement of property, value from Two Thousand


Five Hundred Dollars ($2,500.00) to Fifteen Thousand Dollars


($15,000.00), as provided for in subsection A of Section 1451 of


Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;


131. 132. Extortion, as provided for in Section 1481 of Title


of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;


132. 133. Extortion induced by threats, as provided for in


Section 1482 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;

Req. No. 3305 Page 91


133. 134. Obtain signatures by extortion, as provided for in


Section 1485 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;


134. 135. Extortion by threatening letter, as provided for in


Section 1486 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;


135. 136. Blackmail, as provided for in Section 1488 of Title


of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;


136. 137. Defrauding hotel, inn, or restaurant, value of One


Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) or more, as provided for in Section


1503 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;


137. 138. Renting motor vehicle with bogus check, value of One


Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) or more, as provided for in Section


1521 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;


138. 139. Receive money or property by impersonating another,


value from Two Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($2,500.00) to Fifteen


Thousand Dollars ($15,000.00), as provided for in paragraph 3 of


Section 1532 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;


139. 140. False use of “State Police” with intent to


communicate policing authority, and another is injured, defrauded,


harassed, or vexed, as provided for in subsection G of Section 1533


of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;


140. 141. Identity theft, as provided for in Section 1533.1 of


Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;


141. 142. Felony value – false pretense, bogus check, con game,


valued from Two Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($2,500.00) to Fifteen

Req. No. 3305 Page 92


Thousand Dollars ($15,000.00), as provided for in subsection A of


Section 1541.2 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;


142. 143. Two or more false or bogus checks, valued from Two


Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($2,500.00) to Fifteen Thousand


Dollars ($15,000.00), as provided for in subsection A of Section


1541.3 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;


143. 144. Obtaining money or property with false negotiable


paper, as provided for in Section 1544 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma


Statutes this title;


144. 145. Signs credit or debit card with intent to defraud, as


provided for in subsection (a) A of Section 1550.28 of Title 21 of


the Oklahoma Statutes this title;


145. 146. Possess credit or debit card of another with intent


to defraud, as provided for in subsection (b) B of Section 1550.28


of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;


146. 147. Possessing incomplete credit cards with intent to


complete, as provided for in Section 1550.31 of Title 21 of the


Oklahoma Statutes this title;


147. 148. Possess firearm with altered ID during commission of


a felony, as provided for in subsection A of Section 1550 of Title


of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;


148. 149. Make, sell, or display false identification for


felony purposes or to mislead police officer, as provided for in



Req. No. 3305 Page 93


subsection C of Section 1550.41 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes


this title;


149. 150. Forgery of state, public, court, or corporate seals,


as provided for in Section 1571 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes


this title;


150. 151. Forgery of records, as provided for in Section 1572


of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;


151. 152. Making false entry in records, as provided for in


Section 1573 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;


152. 153. Forgery of certification or acknowledgement of


conveyance, as provided for in Section 1574 of Title 21 of the


Oklahoma Statutes this title;


153. 154. Forgery II / Forgery III, valued from Two Thousand


Five Hundred Dollars ($2,500.00) to Fifteen Thousand Dollars


($15,000.00), as provided for in subsection A of Section 1577 of


Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;


154. 155. Possession of forged evidence of debt, valued from


Two Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($2,500.00) to Fifteen Thousand


Dollars ($15,000.00), as provided for in subsection A of Section


1578 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;


155. 156. Possession of other forged instrument, valued from


Two Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($2,500.00) to Fifteen Thousand


Dollars ($15,000.00), as provided for in subsection A of Section


1579 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;

Req. No. 3305 Page 94


156. 157. Issuing spurious or false certificates of stock, as


provided for in Section 1580 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes


this title;


157. 158. Reissuing canceled certificates of stock, as provided


for in Section 1581 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;


158. 159. Issuing or pledging false evidence of debt, as


provided for in Section 1582 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes


this title;


159. 160. Counterfeiting coin, as provided for in Section 1583


of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;


160. 161. Counterfeiting coin for exportation, as provided for


in Section 1584 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;


161. 162. Forging process of court or title to property, as


provided for in Section 1585 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes


this title;


162. 163. Making false entries in public book, as provided for


in Section 1586 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;


163. 164. Forging tickets of passage, as provided for in


Section 1587 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;


164. 165. Forging postage stamps, as provided for in Section


1588 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;


165. 166. Falsification of corporate records, as provided for


in Section 1589 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;



Req. No. 3305 Page 95


166. 167. Employee making false entries, as provided for in


Section 1590 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;


167. 168. Possessing counterfeit coin with intent to circulate,


as provided for in Section 1591 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes


this title;


168. 169. Uttering forged instruments, value from Two Thousand


Five Hundred Dollars ($2,500.00) to Fifteen Thousand Dollars


($15,000.00), as provided for in subsection A of Section 1592 of


Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;


169. 170. Falsely procuring another’s signature, as provided


for in Section 1593 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;


170. 171. Utter signature of another with same name, as


provided for in Section 1622 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes


this title;


171. 172. Uttering one’s endorsement as another’s, as provided


for in Section 1623 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;


172. 173. Erasure or alterations with intent to defraud, as


provided for in Section 1624 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes


this title;


173. 174. Sign fictitious name as officer of corporation, as


provided for in Section 1626 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes


this title;


174. 175. Fraudulent insolvency of corporation, as provided for


in Section 1639 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;

Req. No. 3305 Page 96


175. 176. Workers’ compensation fraud, as provided for in


Section 1663 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;


176. 177. Willfully poisoning animal, as provided for in


Section 1681 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;


177. 178. Larceny of lost property, value from Two Thousand


Five Hundred Dollars ($2,500.00) to Fifteen Thousand Dollars


($15,000.00), as provided for in paragraph 3 of Section 1702 of


Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;


178. 179. Grand larceny, value from Two Thousand Five Hundred


Dollars ($2,500.00) to Fifteen Thousand Dollars ($15,000.00), as


provided for in subsection A of Section 1705 of Title 21 of the


Oklahoma Statutes this title;


179. 180. Larceny of written instrument, as provided for in


Section 1709 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;


180. 181. Receive, possess, or conceal stolen property, value


from Two Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($2,500.00) to Fifteen


Thousand Dollars ($15,000.00), as provided for in subsection A of


Section 1713 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;


181. 182. Bringing stolen property into state, value from Two


Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($2,500.00) to Fifteen Thousand


Dollars ($15,000.00), as provided for in Section 1715 of Title 21 of


the Oklahoma Statutes this title;


182. 183. Larceny of dogs, as provided for in Section 1718 of


Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;

Req. No. 3305 Page 97


183. 184. Larceny of or receiving stolen fowls, as provided for


in Section 1719 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;


184. 185. Larceny of domesticated fish or game, value One


Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) or more, as provided for in Section


1719.1 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;


185. 186. Larceny of auto, aircraft, or other motor vehicle,


value less than Fifty Thousand Dollars ($50,000.00), as provided for


in Section 1720 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;


186. 187. Larceny from building or house, as provided for in


Section 1723 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;


187. 188. Possession of mercury, as provided for in Section


1726 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;


188. 189. Entering with intent to steal copper, as provided for


in Section 1727 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;


189. 190. Possessing, receiving, or transporting stolen copper,


as provided for in Section 1728 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes


this title;


190. 191. Larceny of merchandise from retailer, value from Two


Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($2,500.00) to Fifteen Thousand


Dollars ($15,000.00), as provided for in subsection A of Section


1731 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;


191. 192. Larceny of trade secrets, value from Two Thousand


Five Hundred Dollars ($2,500.00) to Fifteen Thousand Dollars



Req. No. 3305 Page 98


($15,000.00), as provided for in Section 1732 of Title 21 of the


Oklahoma Statutes this title;


192. 193. Procuring, selling, or receiving telephone records by


fraud (single telephone record), as provided for in subsection A of


Section 1742.2 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;


193. 194. Injury to or obstruction of railroad, as provided for


in Section 1751 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;


194. 195. Interfering with railroad, as provided for in Section


1752.1 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;


195. 196. Possess, use, manufacture, or threaten to use


incendiary device or explosives without injury, as provided for in


Section 1767.1 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;


196. 197. Removing or injuring piles securing bank or dam, as


provided for in Section 1777 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes


this title;


197. 198. Maliciously injuring written instrument, value from


Two Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($2,500.00) to Fifteen Thousand


Dollars ($15,000.00), as provided for in Section 1779 of Title 21 of


the Oklahoma Statutes this title;


198. 199. Place hard object or inflammable object in grain or


cotton, as provided for in Section 1837 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma


Statutes this title;





Req. No. 3305 Page 99


199. 200. Selling five or more unlawful telecommunication


devices within six (6) months, as provided for in subsection B of


Section 1873 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;


200. 201. Manufacturing five or more unlawful


telecommunications devices within six (6) months, as provided for in


subsection B of Section 1874 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes


this title;


201. 202. Unauthorized removal of baggage or cargo from bus or


terminal, as provided for in Section 1904 of Title 21 of the


Oklahoma Statutes this title;


202. 203. Access computer system or network with unlawful


intent, as provided for in Section 1958 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma


Statutes this title;


203. 204. Reproduction of sound recording without consent, one


hundred (100) or more articles, as provided for in Section 1976 of


Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;


204. 205. Unlawfully sell sound recordings, as provided for in


Section 1977 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;


205. 206. Broadcast or live recording for sale without consent,


as provided for in Section 1978 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes


this title;


206. 207. Rent or sell articles without true name of


manufacturer, as provided for in Section 1979 of Title 21 of the


Oklahoma Statutes this title;

Req. No. 3305 Page 100


207. 208. Counterfeiting recording or article label, as


provided for in Section 1980 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes


this title;


208. 209. Violation of Trademark Anti-Counterfeiting Act, as


provided for in Section 1990.2 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes


this title;


209. 210. Tampering with security equipment, as provided for in


Section 1993 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;


210. 211. Sex offender engaging in ice cream truck vending, as


provided for in Section 2100.1 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes


this title;


211. 212. Protective order violation, second or subsequent


offense, as provided for in subsection A of Section 60.6 of Title 22


of the Oklahoma Statutes;


212. 213. Protective order violation resulting in physical


injury, as provided for in subsection B of Section 60.6 of Title 22


of the Oklahoma Statutes;


213. 214. Disposal of seized liquor by officer, as provided for


in Section 1263 of Title 22 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


214. 215. False affidavits, as provided for in Section 1264 of


Title 22 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


215. 216. Interfering with voting machine, as provided for in


Section 9-118 of Title 26 of the Oklahoma Statutes;



Req. No. 3305 Page 101


216. 217. Voting illegally, as provided for in Section 16-102


of Title 26 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


217. 218. Removing ballot from or carrying ballot into polling


place, as provided for in Section 16-102.1 of Title 26 of the


Oklahoma Statutes;


218. 219. False application for an absentee ballot, as provided


for in Section 16-102.2 of Title 26 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


219. 220. False affidavit in voting registration, as provided


for in Section 16-103 of Title 26 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


220. 221. Causing unqualified persons to be invalidly


registered, as provided for in Section 16-103.1 of Title 26 of the


Oklahoma Statutes;


221. 222. False notarization of absentee ballot, as provided


for in Section 16-104 of Title 26 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


222. 223. Perpetrate fraud or theft to affect election, as


provided for in Section 16-105 of Title 26 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


223. 224. Bribes to influence votes, as provided for in Section


16-106 of Title 26 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


224. 225. Offer bribe to withdraw as candidate, as provided for


in Section 16-107 of Title 26 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


225. 226. Solicit or accept bribe for withdrawal of candidacy,


as provided for in Section 16-108 of Title 26 of the Oklahoma


Statutes;



Req. No. 3305 Page 102


226. 227. Prevent person from registering to vote or voting, as


provided for in Section 16-109 of Title 26 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


227. 228. Printing or possession of ballots illegally, as


provided for in Section 16-120 of Title 26 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


228. 229. Violation of the Oklahoma Pollutant Discharge


Elimination System Act, as provided for in subsection G of Section


2-6-206 of Title 27A of the Oklahoma Statutes;


229. 230. Falsely state information to the Department of


Environmental Quality, as provided for in Section 2-7-109 of Title


27A of the Oklahoma Statutes;


230. 231. Falsify information on permit application for


Oklahoma Solid Waste Management Act, as provided for in Section 2-


10-302 of Title 27A of the Oklahoma Statutes;


231. 232. Violation of use of solid waste disposal sites, as


provided for in Section 2-10-801 of Title 27A of the Oklahoma


Statutes;


232. 233. Filing false sale with Insurance Commissioner, as


provided for in Section 311.1 of Title 36 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


233. 234. Selling insurance with revoked or suspended license,


as provided for in subsection A of Section 1435.26 of Title 36 of


the Oklahoma Statutes;


234. 235. Aiding or conspiring with a person whose insurance


license is revoked or suspended, as provided for in subsection B of


Section 1435.26 of Title 36 of the Oklahoma Statutes;

Req. No. 3305 Page 103


235. 236. False statements, reports, or filings with intent to


deceive Insurance Commissioner, as provided for in subsection E of


Section 1643 of Title 36 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


236. 237. Violation of the Viatical Settlements Act of 2008,


value from Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00) to Two Thousand Five


Hundred Dollars ($2,500.00), as provided for in subsection F of


Section 4055.14 of Title 36 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


237. 238. Violation of prepaid funeral provisions, as provided


for in Section 6130 of Title 36 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


238. 239. Out-of-state retailer shipping alcoholic beverages


into state, as provided for in Section 3-101 of Title 37A of the


Oklahoma Statutes;


239. 240. Permit invitee under twenty-one (21) to possess or


consume alcohol, as provided for in subsection A of Section 6-101 of


Title 37A of the Oklahoma Statutes;


240. 241. Permit invitee under twenty-one (21) to possess or


consume alcohol resulting in great bodily injury or death, as


provided for in subsection C of Section 6-101 of Title 37A of the


Oklahoma Statutes;


241. 242. Sale of alcoholic beverages outside of authorized day


or hours, as provided for in Section 6-123 of Title 37A of the


Oklahoma Statutes;





Req. No. 3305 Page 104


242. 243. Disclosing confidential information concerning


violation of Employment Security Act of 1980, as provided for in


Section 4-508 of Title 40 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


243. 244. Hiring armed guards without permit, as provided for


in Section 169 of Title 40 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


244. 245. Causing employee death by commanding to enter steam


boiler, as provided for in Section 183 of Title 40 of the Oklahoma


Statutes;


245. 246. False statement about lien by contractor, as provided


for in Section 142.4 of Title 42 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


246. 247. Mechanics liens/embezzlement, valued from Two


Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($2,500.00) to Fifteen Thousand


Dollars ($15,000.00), as provided for in Section 142.6 of Title 42


of the Oklahoma Statutes;


247. 248. Marrying prohibited persons, as provided for in


Section 14 of Title 43 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


248. 249. Bigamy and remarriage, as provided for in Section 123


of Title 43 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


249. 250. Mistreatment of mental health patient, as provided


for in Section 2-219 of Title 43A of the Oklahoma Statutes;


250. 251. Violation of opioid substitution treatment program,


as provided for in Section 3-601 of Title 43A of the Oklahoma


Statutes;



Req. No. 3305 Page 105


251. 252. Coerce another to execute a declaration of revocation


of an advanced directive, as provided for in subsection D of Section


11-113 of Title 43A of the Oklahoma Statutes;


252. 253. Unauthorized use of implement of husbandry, as


provided for in subsection B of Section 4-102 of Title 47 of the


Oklahoma Statutes;


253. 254. Receive, possess, or conceal implement of husbandry,


as provided for in subsection B of Section 4-103 of Title 47 of the


Oklahoma Statutes;


254. 255. Removed, falsified, or unauthorized identification,


as provided for in subsection A of Section 4-107 of Title 47 of the


Oklahoma Statutes;


255. 256. Buy, receive, possess, or sell motor vehicle with VIN


removed or defaced with intent to conceal, as provided for in


subsection C of Section 4-107 of Title 47 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


256. 257. Destroying, removing, altering, covering, or


counterfeiting trim tag plates, as provided for in Section 4-107a of


Title 47 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


257. 258. Misuse of manufactured home certificate of title, as


provided for in subsection B of Section 4-110 of Title 47 of the


Oklahoma Statutes;


258. 259. Alter manufactured home certificate of title, as


provided for in subsection B of Section 4-110 of Title 47 of the


Oklahoma Statutes;

Req. No. 3305 Page 106


259. 260. Remove receipt with intent to misrepresent payment of


tax or fees, as provided for in subsection B of Section 4-110 of


Title 47 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


260. 261. Purchase registration receipt on assigned certificate


of title, as provided for in subsection B of Section 4-110 of Title


of the Oklahoma Statutes;


261. 262. Misuse of forged, counterfeit, or suspended driver


license, as provided for in Section 6-301 of Title 47 of the


Oklahoma Statutes;


262. 263. Perjury through false affidavit, as provided for in


Section 6-302 of Title 47 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


263. 264. Interference with traffic control device resulting in


injury or death, as provided for in subsection B of Section 11-207


of Title 47 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


264. 265. Buy, sell, or dispose vehicle with altered VIN, chop


shop, as provided for in subsection C of Section 1503 of Title 47 of


the Oklahoma Statutes;


265. 266. Attempt to violate chop shop laws, as provided for in


subsection D of Section 1503 of Title 47 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


266. 267. Perjury before the Corporation Commission, as


provided for in Section 108 of Title 52 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


267. 268. Delay probation duties of the Corporation Commission


with use or attempted use of firearms, as provided for in Section


114 of Title 52 of the Oklahoma Statutes;

Req. No. 3305 Page 107


268. 269. Conspiracy to violate Oklahoma Oil and Gas


Conservation Act, as provided for in Section 115 of Title 52 of the


Oklahoma Statutes;


269. 270. Corruption of Corporation Commission, as provided for


in Section 117 of Title 52 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


270. 271. Misappropriation of gas, as provided for in Section


235 of Title 52 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


271. 272. Falsification of application for emergency relief, as


provided for in Section 26.18 of Title 56 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


272. 273. Medicaid fraud, as provided for in Section 1005 of


Title 56 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


273. 274. Fraudulently obtaining or receiving assistance, value


of Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00) or more, as provided for in


Section 1005.1 of Title 56 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


274. 275. Carry contraband into jail or prison, as provided for


in subsection B of Section 21 of Title 57 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


275. 276. Possess cell phone in jail or prison, as provided for


in subsection E of Section 21 of Title 57 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


276. 277. Jail employee receiving compensation from inmate,


value of Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00) or more, as provided for in


Section 22 of Title 57 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


277. 278. Use of convict labor on private property, as provided


for in Section 222 of Title 57 of the Oklahoma Statutes;



Req. No. 3305 Page 108


278. 279. Failure to comply with Mary Rippy Violent Crime


Offenders Registration Act, as provided for in Section 599 of Title


of the Oklahoma Statutes;


279. 280. Practicing dentistry without a license, as provided


for in subsection B of Section 328.49 of Title 59 of the Oklahoma


Statutes;


280. 281. Giving false information to obtain license, as


provided for in subsection B of Section 328.49 of Title 59 of the


Oklahoma Statutes;


281. 282. Impersonating a pharmacist, as provided for in


Section 353.17A of Title 59 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


282. 283. Alteration of prescription or unlawful dispensing of


drugs, second violation, as provided for in Section 353.24 of Title


of the Oklahoma Statutes;


283. 284. False representation in procuring license under the


Oklahoma Pharmacy Act, as provided for in subsection B of Section


353.25 of Title 59 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


284. 285. Cremation without license and permit, as provided for


in Section 396.33 of Title 59 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


285. 286. Practicing medicine without a license, as provided


for in Section 491 of Title 59 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


286. 287. Violation of the Oklahoma Osteopathic Medicine Act,


as provided for in Section 638 of Title 59 of the Oklahoma Statutes;



Req. No. 3305 Page 109


287. 288. Acting as building inspector without a license, as


provided for in Section 1044 of Title 59 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


288. 289. Affidavit as to undertaking, as provided for in


Section 1322 of Title 59 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


289. 290. Bail jumping, as provided for in Section 1335 of


Title 59 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


290. 291. False declaration of ownership in pawn shop, value of


One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) or more, if property is firearms,


or was acquired through robbery or burglary, as provided for in


subsection C of Section 1512 of Title 59 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


291. 292. Violation of Oklahoma Security Guard and Private


Investigator Act, as provided for in subsection B of Section 1750.11


of Title 59 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


292. 293. Collusion among bidders, as provided for in Section


115 of Title 61 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


293. 294. Disclosure of terms of bids, as provided for in


Section 116 of Title 61 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


294. 295. False or illegal voucher by public official, as


provided for in Section 81 of Title 62 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


295. 296. Use of facsimile signature or seal with intent to


defraud, as provided for in Section 604 of Title 62 of the Oklahoma


Statutes;





Req. No. 3305 Page 110


296. 297. Distribution of controlled substance, possession with


intent, Schedule III, IV, and V drugs, as provided for in subsection


A of Section 2-401 of Title 63 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


297. 298. Distribution of counterfeit controlled substance,


possession with intent, Schedule III, IV, and V drugs, as provided


for in subsection A of Section 2-401 of Title 63 of the Oklahoma


Statutes;


298. 299. Robbery of controlled dangerous substance, as


provided for in subsection B of Section 2-403 of Title 63 of the


Oklahoma Statutes;


299. 300. Distribute or dispense controlled substance without


required order form, as provided for in subsection A of Section 2-


404 of Title 63 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


300. 301. Manufacture, distribute, or dispense controlled


substance not authorized by registration, as provided for in


subsection A of Section 2-404 of Title 63 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


301. 302. Omit, remove, alter, or obliterate symbol required on


controlled substance, as provided for in subsection A of Section 2-


404 of Title 63 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


302. 303. Refuse or fail to make, keep, or furnish required


information, as provided for in subsection A of Section 2-404 of


Title 63 of the Oklahoma Statutes;





Req. No. 3305 Page 111


303. 304. Refuse entry or inspection of premises with respect


to controlled substance, as provided for in subsection A of Section


2-404 of Title 63 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


304. 305. Maintain place for keeping or selling controlled


substance, as provided for in subsection A of Section 2-404 of Title


of the Oklahoma Statutes;


305. 306. Sell, transfer, or provide money transmitter


equipment to unlicensed person, second or subsequent offense, as


provided for in subsection A of Section 2-503.1d of Title 63 of the


Oklahoma Statutes;


306. 307. Responsibility of permit holders, as provided for in


subsection A of Section 124.8 of Title 63 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


307. 308. Purchase or sell body parts for transplantation, as


provided for in Section 2200.16A of Title 63 of the Oklahoma


Statutes;


308. 309. Falsification, forgery, concealment, defacement, or


obliteration of document of gift, as provided for in Section


2200.17A of Title 63 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


309. 310. Unlawful possession of vessel or motor, as provided


for in Section 4209 of Title 63 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


310. 311. Receive, possess, sell, or dispose of stolen vessel


or motor, as provided for in Section 4209.1 of Title 63 of the


Oklahoma Statutes;



Req. No. 3305 Page 112


311. 312. Remove or alter ID number of vessel, as provided for


in subsection B of Section 4209.2 of Title 63 of the Oklahoma


Statutes;


312. 313. Buy, receive, possess, or dispose of vessel with


false ID number with intent to conceal, as provided for in


subsection D of Section 4209.2 of Title 63 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


313. 314. False statement in application for certificate of


title for stolen vehicle, as provided for in Section 4209.3 of Title


of the Oklahoma Statutes;


314. 315. Alteration or forging of vessel certificate of title,


as provided for in Section 4209.4 of Title 63 of the Oklahoma


Statutes;


315. 316. Possess vessel with altered ID number, as provided


for in subsection C of Section 4253 of Title 63 of the Oklahoma


Statutes;


316. 317. Destroying or falsifying checks to the Land Office,


as provided for in Section 1026 of Title 64 of the Oklahoma


Statutes;


317. 318. Prospecting on public lands without permit, as


provided for in Section 1094 of Title 64 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


318. 319. Business for profit by a member of the Department of


Transportation, as provided for in subsection B of Section 304 of


Title 66 of the Oklahoma Statutes;



Req. No. 3305 Page 113


319. 320. Business for profit by a member of the Department of


Transportation, as provided for in subsection B of Section 324 of


Title 66 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


320. 321. Failure to comply with request for county records, as


provided for in Section 83 of Title 67 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


321. 322. Refusal to file tax return with intent to defraud, as


provided for in Section 240.1 of Title 68 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


322. 323. Filing false sales tax report, as provided for in


Section 241 of Title 68 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


323. 324. Possession of controlled dangerous substances without


tax stamp, as provided for in Section 450.8 of Title 68 of the


Oklahoma Statutes;


324. 325. Remove tax stamp with intent to reuse, as provided


for in Section 450.9 of Title 68 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


325. 326. Making false oath to report required by Cotton


Manufacturers Act, as provided for in Section 2003 of Title 68 of


the Oklahoma Statutes;


326. 327. File false income tax return with intent to defraud,


as provided for in Section 2376 of Title 68 of the Oklahoma


Statutes;


327. 328. Fraudulent tax receipt by county treasurer, as


provided for in Section 2920 of Title 68 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


328. 329. False or fraudulent lists of taxable property, as


provided for in Section 2945 of Title 68 of the Oklahoma Statutes;

Req. No. 3305 Page 114


329. 330. False application under Oklahoma Quality Jobs Program


Act, as provided for in Section 3609 of Title 68 of the Oklahoma


Statutes;


330. 331. False application under Former Military Facility


Development Act, as provided for in Section 3807 of Title 68 of the


Oklahoma Statutes;


331. 332. False application under Oklahoma Specialized Quality


Investment Act, as provided for in Section 4109 of Title 68 of the


Oklahoma Statutes;


332. 333. False application under Oklahoma Quality Investment


Act, as provided for in Section 4209 of Title 68 of the Oklahoma


Statutes;


333. 334. Conflict of interest by a member of the


Transportation Commission, as provided for in Section 310 of Title


of the Oklahoma Statutes;


334. 335. Conflict of interest by a member of the Oklahoma


Turnpike Authority, as provided for in Section 1705 of Title 69 of


the Oklahoma Statutes;


335. 336. Violation of Oklahoma Highway Code of 1968, as


provided for in Section 1802 of Title 69 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


336. 337. Conflict of interest by Oklahoma Educational


Television Authority member, as provided for in Section 23-106 of


Title 70 of the Oklahoma Statutes;



Req. No. 3305 Page 115


337. 338. Alter or destroy audit records by Board of Regents,


as provided for in subsection E of Section 3909 of Title 70 of the


Oklahoma Statutes;


338. 339. Authority to receive gifts or funds, as provided for


in subsection B of Section 4306 of Title 70 of the Oklahoma


Statutes;


339. 340. Make takeover offer which is not effective under


Oklahoma Take-over Disclosure Act of 1985, as provided for in


subsection A of Section 453 of Title 71 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


340. 341. Fraudulent, deceptive, or manipulative acts in


takeover offer, as provided for in Section 455 of Title 71 of the


Oklahoma Statutes;


341. 342. Violation of Oklahoma Take-over Disclosure Act of


1985, as provided for in Section 460 of Title 71 of the Oklahoma


Statutes;


342. 343. Conflict of interest by Oklahoma Capitol Improvement


Authority member, as provided for in Section 162 of Title 73 of the


Oklahoma Statutes;


343. 344. Fraud in obtaining certification as a minority


business, as provided for in Section 85.45h of Title 74 of the


Oklahoma Statutes;


344. 345. False statement for small business surety bond


guarantee, as provided for in Section 85.47h of Title 74 of the


Oklahoma Statutes;

Req. No. 3305 Page 116


345. 346. Forge or alter criminal history record, as provided


for in subsection D of Section 150.9 of Title 74 of the Oklahoma


Statutes;


346. 347. Making or receiving kickback, as provided for in


Section 3404 of Title 74 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


347. 348. Pooling of bridge or highway contracts, as provided


for in Section 101 of Title 79 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


348. 349. Business for profit by Oklahoma Water Resources Board


member, as provided for in Section 1086.3 of Title 82 of the


Oklahoma Statutes;


349. 350. Conflict of interest by water district official or


employee, as provided for in Section 1281 of Title 82 of the


Oklahoma Statutes;


350. 351. Falsely executes a written declaration as a witness


to a will, as provided for in paragraph 6 of Section 55 of Title 84


of the Oklahoma Statutes; and


351. 352. False statement and misrepresentation, as provided


for in Section 6 of Title 85A of the Oklahoma Statutes.


B. Any person convicted of a Class D1 criminal offense set


forth in this section shall be punished by imprisonment in the


custody of the Department of Corrections for a term of not more than


five (5) years and shall serve at least twenty percent (20%) of the


sentence imposed before release from custody including release to



Req. No. 3305 Page 117


electronic monitoring pursuant to Section 510.9 of Title 57 of the


Oklahoma Statutes.


C. 1. Every person who, having been previously convicted of


one or two Class C or Class D criminal offenses, commits a Class D1


criminal offense shall, upon conviction, be punished by imprisonment


in the custody of the Department of Corrections for a term of not


less than one (1) year nor more than seven (7) years and shall serve


at least twenty percent (20%) of the sentence imposed before release


from custody including release to electronic monitoring pursuant to


Section 510.9 of Title 57 of the Oklahoma Statutes.


2. Every person who, having been previously convicted of three


Class C or Class D criminal offenses, or one or more Class Y, Class


A, or Class B criminal offenses, commits a Class D1 criminal offense


shall, upon conviction, be punished by imprisonment in the custody


of the Department of Corrections for a term of not less than two (2)


years nor more than ten (10) years and shall serve at least thirty


percent (30%) of the sentence imposed before release from custody


including release to electronic monitoring pursuant to Section 510.9


of Title 57 of the Oklahoma Statutes.


D. Unless specifically exempted pursuant to subsection E of


this section, Section 51.1 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this


title shall not apply to Class D1 criminal offenses.


E. The criminal offenses listed in paragraphs 98 99, 108 109,


212, 213, 214, and 229 230 of subsection A of this section shall be

Req. No. 3305 Page 118


exempt from the penalty provisions provided for in subsections B and


C of this section. Persons convicted of the criminal offenses


provided for in paragraphs 98 99, 108 109, 212, 213, 214, and 229


230 of subsection A of this section shall be punished in accordance


with the corresponding penalties provided for in the Oklahoma


Statutes including Section 51.1 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes


this title.


F. All Class D1 criminal offenses shall be punishable by the


corresponding fines as provided for in the Oklahoma Statutes.


SECTION 21. REPEALER 6 O.S. 2021, Sections 1511, 1512,


1513, 1514, and 1515, are hereby repealed.


SECTION 22. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.




60-2-3305 CAD 1/15/2026 8:47:34 AM





















Req. No. 3305 Page 119